>Graphical user interface, application Description automatically generated<>A
picture containing nature, smoke, spring, steam Description automatically
generated< Sustainable Energy Academy – Module 3 Draft UNDP Sustainable Energy
Hub Module 3: Energy and Sustainable Development Nexus Module overview: The
urgency to address climate change and achieve the 2030 agenda, coupled with the
complexity and interconnectedness of today's global landscape, demands
integrated approaches. Global patterns and emerging insights highlight the power
of SDG combinations in accelerating progress amidst multifaceted development
challenges (SDG Push). Integrated development solutions are required, leveraging
synergies and mitigating trade-offs to enhance structural transformations,
building resilience while leaving no one behind. However, solutions are not one-
size-fits-all; they demand tailored approaches aligned with national priorities.
This module aims to empower participants as change-makers and leaders in
innovative sustainable development solutions, fostering multiple SDG
achievements within energy initiatives. It explores intricate interlinkages
between sustainable energy and various SDGs, offering methodological approaches
and implementation strategies. Chapter 1 elucidates the complex relationship
between energy access and clean cooking (SDG 7.1), renewable energy (SDG 7.2)
and energy efficiency (SDG 7.3) and other SDGs. Chapter 2 delves into tools,
approaches, and methods for strategic innovation, enabling integrated solutions
for multiple challenges. Chapter 3 presents a roadmap for development financing,
focusing on the role of partnerships and collaboration in fostering these
integrated development solutions. Module Learning Objectives: --      Learners
will gain a comprehensive understanding of how sustainable energy intertwines
with other SDGs, exploring opportunities and navigating challenges to create
impactful solutions through synergies and trade-offs. --    Participants will
develop a robust foundation in key approaches, methodologies, and tools across
the sustainable energy initiative cycle, reinforcing systemic strategies to
operationalize the achievement of multiple SDGs. --        Attendees will
explore the evolving landscape of partnerships and financial structures for SDG
interlinkage, uncovering actionable strategies to drive change by fostering
collaboration and leveraging innovative financing mechanisms. --     Enrollees
will engage with real-world case studies and practical applications, revealing
the transformative potential of systemic change, and gaining insights into
sustainable and holistic development strategies involving collaboration and
partnerships. --        Participants will cultivate critical thinking,
operationalize innovative methods, and leverage newfound knowledge in
partnerships and collaboration, propelling them to lead strategic innovations
and emerge as impactful change-makers toward sustainable energy and multiple
signature solutions Module 3: Energy and Sustainable Development Nexus  1 1.
Interlinkages between Energy and other SDGs     2 1.1.  SDG 7.1 Access to
electricity and clean cooking 4 1.1.1.        Maximizing Synergies in
Sustainable Energy Access       5 1.1.2.        Overcoming Energy Access Trade-
offs     8 1.2.  SDG 7.2 Renewable energy        10 1.2.1.       Advancing
Sustainable Prosperity with Renewable Energy  11 1.2.2.       Managing Trade-
offs in Renewable Energy for Sustainable Development     13 1.3. SDG 7.3 Energy
efficiency       15 1.3.1.       Catalyzing Sustainability through Energy
Efficiency     16 1.3.2.       Developing Informed Strategies for Energy
Efficiency Trade-offs 18 2.   Approaches, Methods and Tools for Strategic
Innovation  20 2.1. Approaches      21 2.1.1.       System Thinking Approach
21 2.1.2.       Gender Mainstreaming    22 2.1.3.       Human Rights-Based
Approach     24 2.1.4.       Portfolio Approach      26 2.2. Methods and Tools
28 2.2.1.       The Water-Energy-Food-Ecosystem Nexus   28 2.2.2.       Life
Cycle Assessment   30 2.2.3.       Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis frameworks
31 2.2.4.       Scenario Thinking:      31 2.2.5.       Theory of Change
32 2.2.6.       Digital Intelligence: Machine Learning, Deep Learning and
Artificial Intelligence       32 3.   Partnership and Collaboration for
Development Financing 33 3.1. Partnership Ecosystems for Sustainable Energy and
Integrated SDGs       34 3.1.1.       Compacts, Coalitions, Alliances, Hubs and
Public-Private Partnerships   35 3.1.2.       Joint Programs and Inter-agencies
Initiatives   38 3.1.3.       Multi-Stakeholders Knowledge and Data Platforms 39
3.2. Establishing Effective Partnerships and Collaboration   41 3.2.1.
Building and Managing Effective Multi-Stakeholder Partnerships for SDG Progress
41 3.2.2.       Developing Joint Programs       43 3.3. Financial Mechanism for
Integrated SDGs Achievement     45 3.3.1.       The Collaborative Financial
Landscape   46 3.3.2.       Emerging Financial Solutions and Opportunities  47
3.3.3.       Financing Frameworks, Platforms and Tools       49 Module Warp-Up
54 Main take-home messages      54 What next?   55 References   55 1)
Interlinkages between Energy and other SDGs Since the 2030 Agenda for
Sustainable Development was conceived to be integrated and indivisible, the SDGs
are interlinked and interdependent by design. Hence, SDG Interlinkages refer to
the complex network of interconnections among goals, targets and indicators.
Actions toward one SDG can have positive or negative impacts on others, varying
across geographical and temporal scales. Understanding this complexity and the
directionality of change is key for achieving the Agenda while safeguarding
against unintended SDG deterioration (JCR Website). This approach facilitates
the creation of integrated solutions that drive simultaneous progress across
multiple SDGs by maximizing synergies and minimizing trade-offs, which aids in
optimizing resources and accelerating response times. UNDP's Strategic Plan
2022-2025 embraces integrated development solutions, grounded in a "3x6x3"
framework. This comprehensive structure encompasses three Directions of
Change—structural transformation, leaving no one behind, and building
resilience—guiding systemic transformations beyond 2025. Within this framework,
UNDP focuses on six Signature Solutions: poverty and inequality, gender
equality, energy, environment, resilience, and governance, each aimed at
addressing specific challenges and fostering sustainable development.
Additionally, three Enablers—digitalization, strategic innovation, and
development financing—work synergistically to maximize development impact,
supporting inclusive, ethical, and sustainable societies while aligning capital
flows with the SDGs, for scaled-up finance mobilization. Understanding the
interlinkages between Sustainable Energy for Development and the SDGs
facilitates the creation of strategies addressing multiple Signature Solutions.
By leveraging synergies and circumventing trade-offs, the impact is maximized
toward the Directions of Change while optimizing budgets. Diverse tools aid
decision-makers in identifying these connections, employing visual mapping
methods to illustrate interlinkages among different SDGs, showcasing both
positive and negative causal relations. Examples of such tools include the JRC
SDG Interlinkages Tool, the SDG Interlinkages Analysis & Visualization Tool or
the UNESCAP Methodology for the integration of SDGs into National Planning.
While these tools consolidate available data into valuable insights, bridging
the data gap remains a priority and a key strategy for holistic integrated
development solutions targeting SDG interlinkages. Notably, data collected at
the national level can drive inclusive energy transitions policies shaped by
local contexts and realities. Anchoring solutions in comprehensive and inclusive
data prevents the exacerbation of existing inequalities, with digital solutions
emerging as strategic enablers that span diverse Signature Solutions for
sustainable development. Tools for SDGs interlinkage visualization: JRC SDG
Interlinkages Tool: Developed by the SDG team at the Joint Research Centre
(JRC), this tool comprehensively assesses the interconnectedness within the 2030
Agenda for Sustainable Development. It relies on a meticulous methodology
involving extensive literature reviews, curating a database from 92 selected
publications since the adoption of the 2030 Agenda in 2015. The database
meticulously documents clear interlinkages between different SDG goals, targets,
or indicators, aiding policymakers by providing crucial insights to navigate and
anticipate interactions among SDGs. This tool presents interlinkages at goal and
target levels and offers advanced search capabilities for specific regions,
methods of analysis, and directionalities. SDG Interlinkages Analysis &
Visualization Tool: Developed by the Institute for Global Environmental
Strategies, this interactive tool presents causal relationships between relevant
SDG targets for 27 countries in Asia and Africa. It utilizes statistical
analysis of time-series data for indicators, enhancing network analysis
techniques to showcase potential synergies and trade-offs between the SDG
targets. Country-specific dashboards offer insights into the structure of
interlinkages networks from a systemic perspective, aiding in understanding the
dynamics between SDGs at a granular level. UNESCAP Methodology for the
integration of SDGs into National Planning: Developed by UNESCAP, this
methodology facilitates the analysis of interlinkages between SDGs using a
system thinking approach. Launched in 2016, it focuses on understanding and
analyzing the directionality and strength of interlinkages within and across
specific SDG targets. Utilizing causal loop diagrams, it highlights positive and
reinforcing relationships between interlinked SDG targets, aiding in
synchronized and integrated SDG implementation planning. The tool focuses on
Asia and the Pacific, mapping causal relations to enhance analysis of SDG
interconnectedness. Tools for SDGs interlinkage visualization: JRC SDG
Interlinkages Tool: Developed by the SDG team at the Joint Research Centre
(JRC), this tool comprehensively assesses the interconnectedness within the 2030
Agenda for Sustainable Development. It relies on a meticulous methodology
involving extensive literature reviews, curating a database from 92 selected
publications since the adoption of the 2030 Agenda in 2015. The database
meticulously documents clear interlinkages between different SDG goals, targets,
or indicators, aiding policymakers by providing crucial insights to navigate and
anticipate interactions among SDGs. This tool presents interlinkages at goal and
target levels and offers advanced search capabilities for specific regions,
methods of analysis, and directionalities. SDG Interlinkages Analysis &
Visualization Tool: Developed by the Institute for Global Environmental
Strategies, this interactive tool presents causal relationships between relevant
SDG targets for 27 countries in Asia and Africa. It utilizes statistical
analysis of time-series data for indicators, enhancing network analysis
techniques to showcase potential synergies and trade-offs between the SDG
targets. Country-specific dashboards offer insights into the structure of
interlinkages networks from a systemic perspective, aiding in understanding the
dynamics between SDGs at a granular level. UNESCAP Methodology for the
integration of SDGs into National Planning: Developed by UNESCAP, this
methodology facilitates the analysis of interlinkages between SDGs using a
system thinking approach. Launched in 2016, it focuses on understanding and
analyzing the directionality and strength of interlinkages within and across
specific SDG targets. Utilizing causal loop diagrams, it highlights positive and
reinforcing relationships between interlinked SDG targets, aiding in
synchronized and integrated SDG implementation planning. The tool focuses on
Asia and the Pacific, mapping causal relations to enhance analysis of SDG
interconnectedness. This chapter unpacks the main synergies and trade-off for
each of the SDG 7 outcome target: achieving universal access to energy and clean
cooking (SDG 7.1), fostering the adoption of renewable energy (SDG 7.2), and
transitioning toward energy-efficient consumption (SDG 7.3). It features case
studies developed by UNDP and relevant UN agencies, showcasing efforts to
leverage synergies or counteract trade-offs. Highlighted are the connections of
these solutions with the 3x6x3 framework, emphasizing the involved Signature
Solutions, Key Enablers, and advanced Direction of Change. 1)        SDG 7.1
Access to electricity and clean cooking Figure 1. Circular Sankey Chart
representing synergies and trade-offs between SDG 7.1 and other SDGs, based on
the JRC SDG Interlinkages Tool developed by the European Commission Despite
significant progress in electricity access globally, challenges persist. The
COVID-19 and complexities in reaching remote areas slowed progress, leaving 733
million without electricity and 2.8 billion people relying on polluting fuels
for cooking in 2020. The majority of these populations live in sub-Saharan
Africa, Asia, especially in Least Developed Countries (LDCs) and rural areas.
Economic strains due to the pandemic hindered access for up to 90 million. If
trends continue, an estimated 670 million will lack electricity by 2030, with
one-fourth of the world's population still lacking clean cooking. Addressing
this gap requires a major push to assist those living in the least developed
areas and in fragile and conflict-affected countries. The goal of ensuring
universal access to affordable, reliable, and modern energy services, such as
electricity and clean cooking mechanisms, is framed within SDG 7.1. Its
interconnectedness with various goals (Figure 1) offers synergies to address
multiple global challenges, amplifying opportunities for education, health, food
security and economic development. However, this goal necessitates balancing
energy sufficiency and affordability, ensuring effective battery management,
while guaranteeing inclusiveness and gender-responsiveness. The subsequent
sections provide a concise explanation of these synergies and trade-offs,
supported by relevant case studies. 1)       Maximizing Synergies in Sustainable
Energy Access Enlightening Education: Well-lit, heated, and cooled schools and
households create comfortable and effective learning spaces for children and
adults (SDG 4). Illumination extends education opportunities into evening
classes, catering to diverse schedules. Modern information and communication
technologies (SDG 9), powered through electricity access, significantly enhance
learning experiences and foster digital literacy. Access to affordable,
reliable, and modern energy in schools significantly improves education quality
and accessibility. Furthermore, access to the Internet supports digital
connectivity of rural schools, which during COVID-19 has been key for
educational resilience (ICSU, 2017). Access to quality education results in
enhanced educational attainment and high completion rates, providing lifelong
benefits to children. Enhancing Health Services and Water Access through
Electricity: Access to reliable electricity is fundamental for health services
(SDG 3), safe childbirth, vaccinations, diagnostics, and emergency response
(WHO, 2023). Nearly 1 billion people in low- and lower-middle-income countries
lack reliable electricity in healthcare facilities (WHO, 2023). Electricity
enables rural populations to store and refrigerate medicines and vaccines,
ensuring community health. It powers vital medical devices, lighting and
communications. Electricity is also key for improving household health
conditions, through clean indoor environments, cooking facilities, and thermal
comfort (heating and cooling). Energy also contributes to expanding water and
sanitation services (SDG 6), particularly in water-stressed regions.
Decentralized solar PV water pumps can replace more expensive diesel pumps and
mini-grids can power filtration technologies, such as reverse osmosis systems,
to produce clean drinking water (IEA, 2023), powering a shift toward
unconventional water supply options (e.g. desalination). In schools, energy can
power refrigeration and access to water and sanitation, essential for children’s
health and safe nutrition. For instance, Solar PV systems and solar pumps
installed by UNICEF (Box 1) have been used successfully in educational
facilities to provide better access to safe water and hygienic sanitation. Box
1: In 2019, The UNICEF’s Solar-powered water systems program installed more than
1,200 solar-powered water systems in over 40 countries across six regions,
providing water to the most vulnerable children and their families in remote
areas. The initiative deployed renewable energy access solutions prioritizing
public service facilities such as health facilities, schools, and community
centers. In Nigeria, 371 systems helped provide water and power to 52 schools
and 85 health-care facilities, and large-scale solar-powered systems were
implemented in Afghanistan, Somalia, South Sudan and Yemen in emergency
contexts. Box 1: In 2019, The UNICEF’s Solar-powered water systems program
installed more than 1,200 solar-powered water systems in over 40 countries
across six regions, providing water to the most vulnerable children and their
families in remote areas. The initiative deployed renewable energy access
solutions prioritizing public service facilities such as health facilities,
schools, and community centers. In Nigeria, 371 systems helped provide water and
power to 52 schools and 85 health-care facilities, and large-scale solar-powered
systems were implemented in Afghanistan, Somalia, South Sudan and Yemen in
emergency contexts. Leveraging Electricity for Food Security and Productive
Development: Providing affordable, reliable, and modern energy services to the
world's poor aligns with poverty eradication and reducing inequalities (SDG 1
and 10). In rural areas, where many lack energy access, empowering impoverished
farmers with energy facilitates groundwater pumping, mechanization of farming,
and maintenance of temperature-controlled supply chains. This enhances food crop
yields, diversifies regional diets, and contributes to income generation (SDG2
and SDG 8). The World Bank projects that by 2030, two-thirds of the world’s
extreme poor will live in fragile, conflict and violence settings. As a result,
achieving SDG 2 (Zero Hunger) and SDG 10 (Reduce Inequalities) demands
innovative solutions. The adoption of solar-powered irrigation systems in Yemen
is an example of an innovative and conflict-resilient practice that has
safeguarded food production capacities (Box 2). Box 2: Between 2018 and 2022,
the Yemen Emergency Electricity Access Project (YEEAP) spearheaded the expansion
of electricity access in rural and peri-urban areas through solar solutions.
This World Bank-funded initiative, executed by the United Nations Office for
Project Services (UNOPS) alongside local entities, empowered six microfinance
institutions to introduce financing products for small-scale energy systems.
Over 3.2 million people, notably 51% female, accessed critical services like
water, education, and healthcare, including support for COVID-19, through solar-
powered facilities. Box 2: Between 2018 and 2022, the Yemen Emergency
Electricity Access Project (YEEAP) spearheaded the expansion of electricity
access in rural and peri-urban areas through solar solutions. This World Bank-
funded initiative, executed by the United Nations Office for Project Services
(UNOPS) alongside local entities, empowered six microfinance institutions to
introduce financing products for small-scale energy systems. Over 3.2 million
people, notably 51% female, accessed critical services like water, education,
and healthcare, including support for COVID-19, through solar-powered
facilities. Energizing Gender Equality: Household air pollution causes around 13
deaths per minute, mostly affecting women and girls who shoulder household
responsibilities and face exposure to polluting lighting and cooking methods
(SDG 3 and 5) (ICSU, 2017). Women and girls, spending up to 18 hours weekly on
wood gathering and household cooking. (UNDP, 2022). Therefore, access to clean
energy directly aids in reducing women's time poverty, for instance thanks to
equipment such as fridges and washing machines, allowing better educational
attendance. Furthermore, access to energy is a key enabler for broadening
opportunities for women. Studies indicate a 9 to 23% increase in women's
employment post-electrification (UN, 2022). Public outdoor lighting increases
security for women and girls, allowing more autonomy after dark and reducing
exposure to gender-based violence. Information technologies and the Internet
reduce the digital divide and foster digital inclusion for women and girls (WEF,
2023) (ITU, 2020). Empowered women are more likely to drive local initiatives
benefiting from cleaner cooking and lighting, which directly impacts their
lives. UNDP’s integrated projects in India and Nepal have shown promising
results toward energy access, women’s equality and productive opportunities
development (Box 3). UN Women's efforts in Ethiopia, included interest-free
loans and entrepreneurship training benefiting over 19,500 women, enabling them
to invest in an energy-saving cooking stove cooperative (Box 4). Box 3: UNDP's
energy access projects have significantly bolstered livelihoods, particularly
for women, increasing income potential by up to 2.5 times. In India's Jharkhand
State, solar stations facilitated by the UNDP have empowered women-run micro-
enterprises, enabling them to produce essential hygiene products while earning
an income. Similarly, in Nepal's Solta Bazaar, a solar minigrid supported a
health lab and an IT training center, providing crucial services and education,
sparing women long journeys for medical care. Box 3: UNDP's energy access
projects have significantly bolstered livelihoods, particularly for women,
increasing income potential by up to 2.5 times. In India's Jharkhand State,
solar stations facilitated by the UNDP have empowered women-run micro-
enterprises, enabling them to produce essential hygiene products while earning
an income. Similarly, in Nepal's Solta Bazaar, a solar minigrid supported a
health lab and an IT training center, providing crucial services and education,
sparing women long journeys for medical care. Box 4: The UN Women-Joint
Programme, initiated in Ethiopia in 2011, unites six UN agencies to bolster
gender equality and women's empowerment. With a focus on all 11 regions, it
aligns with Ethiopia's development frameworks, aiming to enhance women's income,
education, and rights while promoting leadership. Supported by Sweden and
Norway, the program includes interest-free loans and business skill development,
creating a revolving fund for women's empowerment. Notably, the initiative has
enabled women, to invest in an energy-saving cooking stove cooperative,
fostering economic empowerment within their village and beyond. Box 4: The UN
Women-Joint Programme, initiated in Ethiopia in 2011, unites six UN agencies to
bolster gender equality and women's empowerment. With a focus on all 11 regions,
it aligns with Ethiopia's development frameworks, aiming to enhance women's
income, education, and rights while promoting leadership. Supported by Sweden
and Norway, the program includes interest-free loans and business skill
development, creating a revolving fund for women's empowerment. Notably, the
initiative has enabled women, to invest in an energy-saving cooking stove
cooperative, fostering economic empowerment within their village and beyond. 2)
Overcoming Energy Access Trade-offs Balancing Affordability and Sufficiency:
Energy sufficiency and affordability pose challenges in transitioning to clean
energy technologies, potentially leading to a return to polluting energy
sources. Off-grid solutions, with low capacities, might fail to meet surging
demand, necessitating a reliance on polluting fuels. The lack of reliable energy
availability can breed dissatisfaction among users, eroding confidence in clean
energy sources. A similar dilemma arises in clean cooking: high upfront costs
and unreliable LPG supply hinder rural communities from abandoning biomass (UCL,
2021). The United Nations Joint Programme for Sustainable Charcoal Reduction and
Alternative Livelihoods (PROSCAL), implemented an integrated approach for the
reduction of charcoal consumption in Somalia (Box 5). On the contrary, increased
access to affordable, reliable energy can inadvertently foster wasteful water
consumption and overexploitation of resources, known as the "rebound effect".
For instance, unconventional water supply options such as desalination are
highly energy-intensive (ICSU, 2017). This phenomenon extends to agricultural
practices. Strategies focused on energy sufficiency measures, affordability
mechanism, and capacity building have shown promise in mitigating these rebound
effects (WBG, 2017) (WLPGA, 2018). Case Study 1: RBA: United Nations Joint
Program for Sustainable Charcoal Reduction and Alternative Livelihoods (PROSCAL)
Case Study: RBA: United Nations Joint Program for Sustainable Charcoal Reduction
and Alternative Livelihoods (PROSCAL) Location: Somalia <a href="https://info.un
dp.org/docs/pdc/Documents/SOM/PROSCAL-%20PIP%20-
%202016.pdf">https://info.undp.org/docs/pdc/Documents/SOM/PROSCAL-%20PIP%20-
%202016.pdf</a> <a href="https://open.undp.org/projects/00085377">https://open.u
ndp.org/projects/00085377</a> The United Nations Joint Program for Sustainable
Charcoal Reduction and Alternative Livelihoods (PROSCAL) ran from 2016 to 2022
with the objective of reducing unsustainable charcoal production, trade, and
usage in Somalia. It sought to bolster energy security and livelihoods by
engaging stakeholders, enforcing trade bans, developing alternative energy,
transitioning charcoal practices, and promoting reforestation. PROSCAL's
interventions aimed to create local economic opportunities, diminish poverty,
halt environmental degradation, improve energy security, foster resilience among
vulnerable groups, diversify energy sources, mitigate conflict, and promote
peace and development. Ensuring Sustainable Batteries Management: Renewable-
based energy access solutions, such as solar or wind, heavily rely on batteries
to overcome natural resources’ intermittence. However, improper maintenance and
disposal of batteries can lead to severe pollution, impacting human health (SDG
3) and ecosystems (SDG 14-15). With millions of these products sold in recent
years, effective waste management will become increasingly important (Lighting
Global, 2022). Stakeholders and companies must prioritize robust commitment to
proper battery management, covering maintenance, security standards, and
disposal. E-waste regulation planning is becoming integral to operational plans,
fostering innovation and strategic partnerships, especially in regions lacking
e-waste infrastructure. For example, only a few countries in sub-Saharan Africa
(including Rwanda, Nigeria, Kenya and South Africa), have e-waste management
facilities, equipped for off-grid solar value-chain recycling, and cross-
boundary movement is expensive and complex. The scarcity of e-waste management
facilities capable of handling end-of-life products from off-grid solar
necessitates immediate attention and action (Lighting Global, 2022) (other
sources). The Global Battery Alliance (Box 6) has emerged to tackle these
challenges. In their recent report, the Alliance highlights the need for pilot
projects aimed at launching and scaling effective corporate reverse logistics
programs. Additionally, they advocate for establishing traceability and
disclosure systems to address these critical issues (GBA, 2021). Box 6: The
Global Battery Alliance (GBA), initiated at the World Economic Forum in 2017,
aims to ensure a sustainable battery value chain by 2030 through a collective
effort involving international organizations, NGOs, industry, academia, and
governments. This alliance focuses on Action Partnerships, tackling critical
areas like establishing global criteria for sustainable batteries, ensuring
responsible sourcing of materials, and promoting energy access in emerging
economies while emphasizing circular practices to reduce lead poisoning and
environmental impacts. Box 6: The Global Battery Alliance (GBA), initiated at
the World Economic Forum in 2017, aims to ensure a sustainable battery value
chain by 2030 through a collective effort involving international organizations,
NGOs, industry, academia, and governments. This alliance focuses on Action
Partnerships, tackling critical areas like establishing global criteria for
sustainable batteries, ensuring responsible sourcing of materials, and promoting
energy access in emerging economies while emphasizing circular practices to
reduce lead poisoning and environmental impacts. The Moment of Leaving No One
Behind: Remote communities lacking grid access, marked by low population
density, incomes, challenging terrains, and poor infrastructure, confront
significant hurdles in accessing electricity. These communities can be grouped
into three categories: geographically remote regions like rural settings,
mountainous areas, small islands, and deep forests; communities with a remote
chance of gaining grid access, including displaced refugees due to conflict or
natural disasters; and those fully dependent on off-grid energy with minimal
demand profiles, such as Indigenous communities. Despite varying
characteristics, these settlements share commonalities in low electricity needs,
economic and energy poverty, and a remote likelihood of obtaining grid-based
electricity supply (IRENA, 2023). The diverse profile of last-mile communities
necessitates community-centric models to ensure tailored solutions that fit
their unique characteristics and needs. Successful and inclusive projects in the
Hindu Kush Himalaya region (Box 7) showcase effective approaches addressing the
challenges of last-mile regions (HIMAP, 2019) (ADB, 2023). Box 7: Through an
intervention called “Creating Self Sustainable, Smart and Low Carbon Villages”,
the Global Himalayan Expedition (GHE) is helping remote Himalayan communities
lacking electricity access to transform through locally designed, locally
implemented and locally maintained solutions. Their aim is to bring about
holistic change by merging the elements of sustainability, clean cooking,
digital education, homestay tourism and solar-based electrification. Being
connected with a solar grid gives villages a future and protects their cultural
heritage. Box 7: Through an intervention called “Creating Self Sustainable,
Smart and Low Carbon Villages”, the Global Himalayan Expedition (GHE) is helping
remote Himalayan communities lacking electricity access to transform through
locally designed, locally implemented and locally maintained solutions. Their
aim is to bring about holistic change by merging the elements of sustainability,
clean cooking, digital education, homestay tourism and solar-based
electrification. Being connected with a solar grid gives villages a future and
protects their cultural heritage. Avoiding Gender Blindness in Energy Access:
Social norms and gender roles can hinder women from benefiting equally from
energy access initiatives, discourage them from participating in the sector’s
labor force, and impacting their inclusion in decision-making processes. Gender-
blind initiatives counteract women's equality, worsening gender gaps in energy
poverty (SDG Action, 2023). Affordability mechanisms that neglect women deepen
dependency, as they often receive lower salaries and depend on men's income.
Low-capacity electricity systems, like small-capacity SHS, can perpetuate
women's reliance on polluting mechanisms. While clean light intends to enhance
work hours, it may burden women with longer schedules, reducing rest time. Women
are particularly vulnerable in conflict, disaster, and emergency settings, with
millions forcibly displaced, lacking access to modern lighting and facing risks
like violence and fuel-related challenges. The lack of gender-responsive
training for off-grid systems can exclude women, hindering initiatives and
reinforcing gender inequality. The enabling environment for women's
participation in the energy sector requires gender-responsive planning,
policymaking, regulation, and progress tracking through gender-disaggregated
data collection and analysis (SDGs UN, 2021). Making women being agents of
change improve energy access initiatives development 2) SDG 7.2 Renewable energy
Figure 2. Circular Sankey Chart representing synergies and trade-offs between
SDG 7.2 and others SDGs, based on the JRC SDG Interlinkages Tool developed by
the European Commission Energy is one of the main contributors to climate
change, accounting for 73% of human-caused greenhouse gases. The developing
world, particularly Africa with its carbon emissions accounting for less than
three percent of global energy-related emissions, will bear the brunt of climate
change impacts. Renewable energy use rose to 17.7 % in 2019, notably in
electricity generation, hitting 26.2 %. Investment costs for small-scale
renewable energy technologies (e.g., Solar Home Systems) dropped considerably in
recent years, making these solutions competitive and signaling wider
profitability ahead (ICSU, 2017). Some of the poorer regions of the world
possess high-quality renewable resources (e.g. biomass and solar power in
Africa), offering potential for poverty alleviation if leveraged effectively
(ICSU, 2017). However, progress needs acceleration, especially in heating and
transport sectors. Effective climate action demands bolstering policy support
across all sectors and enhancing tools to mobilize private capital (UN-Habitat,
2022). Increasing renewable energy adoption aligns with SDG 7.2 and
interconnects with multiple goals, offering solutions to various global
challenges while providing opportunities for health, jobs, and gender equality.
They also mitigate climate change impact and improve cities and communities’
resilience. However, renewable energy initiatives should place particular
attention to trade-offs such as water stress, land use conflicts, life cycle
environmental impacts and governance issues, emphasizing community rights and
sustainability. This section highlights complexities in renewable energy's
impacts and initiatives aiding comprehensive understanding of its effects. This
section explores renewable energy's complexities and includes case studies for a
comprehensive understanding of its impacts. 1)  Advancing Sustainable Prosperity
with Renewable Energy Clean Energy for Climate Action: Accelerating the
penetration of renewable energy aligns with the Paris Agreement's goal of
limiting global warming to below 2°C (SDG 13) (ICSU, 2017). Renewable energy
sources are less water-intensive than conventional sources, which is highly
relevant amid water scarcity and erratic flows caused by climate change. The
global energy system used 10% of total global freshwater withdrawals in 2021,
due to the essential role of water in the energy supply chain, from electricity
generation to fossil fuel production (IEA, 2023). The IEA’s <a
href="https://www.iea.org/reports/global-energy-and-climate-model/net-zero-
emissions-by-2050-scenario-nze">Net Zero Emissions by 2050 Scenario</a> predicts
a nearly 15% decline in water use within the power sector due to transitioning
from coal to solar PV and wind energy. Replacing off-shore petroleum extraction
by renewable energy generated from offshore wind, wave and tidal power farms can
contribute to conserving and sustainably using marine resources (SDG 14).
Upscaling of renewables will help decrease ocean acidification (via lower carbon
emissions), accidental impacts from energy-production and transport activities
on aquatic habitats, and marine thermal pollution from cooling at coastal power
plants (ICSU, 2017). Healthier Cities and Resilient Societies: The use of
renewable energy resources directly reduces air pollution. Improving air
quality, and by extension human health, is especially important for those living
in the dense urban centers of rapidly developing countries (SDG 3) (ICSU, 2017).
Resilient infrastructure, inclusive industrialization, and innovation (SDG 9)
are prerequisites for achieving the SDG 7.2 target (ICSU, 2017). Clean energy
systems, in particular, create the conditions for cities and human settlements
to be inclusive, safe, resilient, less-polluting, and more sustainable (SDG 11).
An up-scaling of renewable energy can have a large impact on the sustainability
of cities and communities. Similarly, sustainable urban planning, transport, and
housing are key for achieving SDG 7.2, since renewable solutions are fundamental
pillars of the solutions portfolio. Smart grids and energy communities
facilitate the development of renewable energy at the domestic or neighborhood
scale (ICSU, 2017). Furthermore, decentralized renewable energy sources enhance
resilience. This is exemplified by the City Energy Resilience Framework,
developed by the Resilient Cities Network (R-Cities) and Urban Power (Box 8).
Box 8: The City Energy Resilience Framework (CERF) serves as a comprehensive
guide for cities to bolster their energy transition and urban resilience. It
encompasses aspects of electricity infrastructure, clean energy, equitable
service access, emergency management, and recovery strategies. As an engagement
tool, CERF unites stakeholders to evaluate challenges and opportunities for
resilient energy systems based on local policies and initiatives. By
highlighting global examples, CERF encourages dialogue on adopting multi-benefit
energy solutions that empower urban communities to adapt and thrive amidst
adversities. Box 8: The City Energy Resilience Framework (CERF) serves as a
comprehensive guide for cities to bolster their energy transition and urban
resilience. It encompasses aspects of electricity infrastructure, clean energy,
equitable service access, emergency management, and recovery strategies. As an
engagement tool, CERF unites stakeholders to evaluate challenges and
opportunities for resilient energy systems based on local policies and
initiatives. By highlighting global examples, CERF encourages dialogue on
adopting multi-benefit energy solutions that empower urban communities to adapt
and thrive amidst adversities. Inclusive Working Opportunities: Renewable energy
deployment bolsters innovation and reinforces local, regional, and national
employment objectives (SDG 8). The global renewable energy sector employs 12.7
million people, with significant growth in solar PV, primarily in Asia
accounting for 79% of the global total. Wind and hydropower, as well as liquid
biofuels make up most of the rest of the growth in renewable energy jobs. China
dominates employment in most renewable energy sectors, however Brazil has the
most biofuel jobs (WEF, 2023). While gender parity remains low in the renewable
energy sector and technical positions, companies with at least 30% female
leadership yield higher profit margins and are more inclined to invest in
sustainability and environmental initiatives (SDGs, 2022). Renewable energy’s
value chain presents new opportunities, particularly for women (SDG 5), as
greater gender diversity has shown to enhance both effectiveness and financial
performance. A fair energy transition is essential for equalizing opportunities
in employment and leadership roles, emphasizing the importance of access to
quality jobs and finance in empowering women and their families (UN Women).
UNDP-supported initiatives in <a href="https://undp-
climate.exposure.co/empowered-women">Peru</a> (Box 9) and <a
href="https://www.undp.org/yemen/stories/yemeni-rural-women-launch-
country%E2%80%99s-first-private-solar-energy-grid">Yemen</a> (Box 10) showcase
women's impact as clean energy promotors. Case Study 2: RBLAC: e-Mujer, the
Energy School for Women. Case Study: RBLAC: e-Mujer, the Energy School for Women
Location: Perú <a href="https://undp-climate.exposure.co/empowered-
women">https://undp-climate.exposure.co/empowered-women</a> In Peru, e-Mujer,
the Energy School for Women. This pilot project, funded by the Global
Environment Facility and implemented by the Peruvian Ministry of Energy and
Mines and the United Nations Development Programme, trains rural women to use,
install, maintain, and commercialize clean energy systems such as solar panels
and improved cookstoves. Box 10: In Yemen, rural women led the establishment of
the nation's first private solar energy grid under the Enhanced Rural Resilience
in Yemen (ERRY) Joint Programme. Supported by the European Union (EU) and
implemented by FAO, ILO, UNDP, and WFP across four Yemeni governorates, this
initiative empowered ten female entrepreneurs through UNDP's 3x6 Approach. Over
three years, the project aims to strengthen crisis-affected rural communities,
focusing on sustainable livelihoods, food security, governance, social cohesion,
and access to sustainable energy. UNDP collaborates with the Sustainable
Development Foundation (SDF) in this endeavor. Box 10: In Yemen, rural women led
the establishment of the nation's first private solar energy grid under the
Enhanced Rural Resilience in Yemen (ERRY) Joint Programme. Supported by the
European Union (EU) and implemented by FAO, ILO, UNDP, and WFP across four
Yemeni governorates, this initiative empowered ten female entrepreneurs through
UNDP's 3x6 Approach. Over three years, the project aims to strengthen crisis-
affected rural communities, focusing on sustainable livelihoods, food security,
governance, social cohesion, and access to sustainable energy. UNDP collaborates
with the Sustainable Development Foundation (SDF) in this endeavor. 2)
Managing Trade-offs in Renewable Energy for Sustainable Development Water
Security Challenges of the Clean Energy Transition: Transitioning from fossil
energy to renewables generally reduces water consumption and limits thermal and
chemical pollution into aquatic ecosystems. Yet, mismanaged renewable sources
like bioenergy and hydropower could exacerbate existing water-related issues
(ICSU, 2017) (SDG 6). Furthermore, growing water stress in dry regions poses a
threat to the power sector regarding energy security, potentially reducing
hydropower generation in regions with declining water flows such as southern
Europe, North Africa and the Middle East. Variability in hydropower production
has worsened the global energy crisis. Reduced hydropower generation in Latin
America during 2021 drove up the demand for liquefied natural gas, resulting in
early pressure on natural gas prices. Similarly, the significant drop in
hydropower output in southern Europe in 2022 compounded the strain on gas and
electricity markets due to Russia's invasion of Ukraine, leading to cuts in
pipeline gas deliveries (IEA, 2023). Balancing Land use for Renewable Energy and
Food Security: Compared to conventional sources, renewables often demand more
land, potentially conflicting with ecosystem protection (SDG 15) and food
security (SDG 2). Scaling up bioenergy might clash with efforts to sustainably
manage forests, halt deforestation, and protect biodiversity through practices
like monocropping for energy crops and large-scale solar installations.
Developing agrofuels could elevate global food prices and compete for
agricultural resources, impacting affordability and access to food for the
vulnerable (ICSU, 2017). Large-scale renewable projects, especially
hydroelectric dams, significantly affect land use, disrupting local economies
such as agriculture and fishing and aggravating food security (SDGs, 2022).
Local land-use changes can scale up impacts at global scale, requiring
international coordination and systemic approaches (ICSU, 2017). Multiple land
uses and integrated solutions can reduce adverse impacts of renewable energy.
Bioenergy’s unique aspect lies in its potential as a land management co-product,
supporting ecological services like soil restoration, wildfire prevention, and
habitat preservation (SDGs, 2022). Adopting policies that prioritize bioenergy
crop growth on degraded lands can mitigate global agricultural market impacts
while enhancing soil health and biodiversity (ICSU, 2017). Notably, the “Solar
Pyramid”, project in Curitiba, Brazil, utilized landfills for solar power
plants, supported by C40’s network, a coalition of mayors fighting climate
change (Box 11). Emerging technologies like agrivoltaics serve as innovative
integrated land-use systems, enabling simultaneous production of food,
electricity, and water, (FAO, 2021) (EU Science Hub, 2023), as exemplified by
the Indian case study (Box 12) Box 11: The Solar Pyramid launched in 2023 in
Curitiba is the Latin America's first solar plant on a former landfill, backed
by C40's CFF. This landmark project demonstrates how cities can achieve clean,
affordable energy while decreasing reliance on fossil fuels in their urban
grids. The city primarily relies on hydroelectric power but faces energy
shortages during droughts, resorting to fossil gas and coal plants. The Solar
Pyramid supplies 8MW of energy capacity across Curitiba, slashing CO2 emissions
by 90,000 tonnes (2020-2050), akin to removing 20,000 cars yearly. Additionally,
it generates US$500,000 annually by substituting grid electricity with solar
production. Box 11: The Solar Pyramid launched in 2023 in Curitiba is the Latin
America's first solar plant on a former landfill, backed by C40's CFF. This
landmark project demonstrates how cities can achieve clean, affordable energy
while decreasing reliance on fossil fuels in their urban grids. The city
primarily relies on hydroelectric power but faces energy shortages during
droughts, resorting to fossil gas and coal plants. The Solar Pyramid supplies
8MW of energy capacity across Curitiba, slashing CO2 emissions by 90,000 tonnes
(2020-2050), akin to removing 20,000 cars yearly. Additionally, it generates
US$500,000 annually by substituting grid electricity with solar production. Box
12: Agrivoltaics is rapidly expanding globally, and India is initiating its
adoption with over a dozen pilot projects nationwide. A research led by the
International Institute for Sustainable Development (IISD), evaluates the
current development status, outlining challenges and opportunities for
Agrivoltaics commercialization in India. The work aims to expedite adoption by
offering policy recommendations, proposing business models, and providing a
financial and technical transitions mechanism for state agencies, developers,
and stakeholders. Box 12: Agrivoltaics is rapidly expanding globally, and India
is initiating its adoption with over a dozen pilot projects nationwide. A
research led by the International Institute for Sustainable Development (IISD),
evaluates the current development status, outlining challenges and opportunities
for Agrivoltaics commercialization in India. The work aims to expedite adoption
by offering policy recommendations, proposing business models, and providing a
financial and technical transitions mechanism for state agencies, developers,
and stakeholders. Environmental Footprint of Green Energy Value Chain: Renewable
energies' impact on water resources (SDG 14) and (SDG 15) land footprints extend
across their entire value chain. The extraction of minerals necessary for
manufacturing renewable components like solar, wind, and batteries, coupled with
challenges in end-of-life recycling, significantly influences their
environmental implications. Subterranean footprints from drilling boreholes or
fracking can affect water aquifers and geological formations. Evaluating their
environmental footprint mandates a comprehensive assessment of land impacts,
considering the entire life cycle, from fuel extraction to decommissioning.
Notably, a single energy technology can vary significantly in its land
footprint. For example, solar panels made from cadmium have a smaller land
footprint compared to silicon panels (Our World in Data, 2022). These
environmental impacts, including mining materials and energy consumption during
refining processes, underscore the critical role of deployment choices and
technological considerations. Governance and Community Rights in Renewable
Energy: The pursuit of critical energy transition materials drives attention
toward sustainable socioeconomic growth. Renewable energy manufacturing
Initiatives can bolster local manufacturing and create jobs, but can also
contribute to environmental harm and exploitation of workers and communities
(SDG 8). Efforts to secure these resources through export bans and industry
nationalization align with national economic interests but require comprehensive
approaches that uphold community rights, labor rights, and environmental
sustainability (IRENA, 2023). Moreover, large-scale renewable energy projects,
such as hydropower dams or bioenergy, can disrupt traditional land management,
impact on community cohesion and violate legitimate land tenure rights (SDG 1).
Documented human rights abuses, including threats, land grabs and harm to
indigenous communities, highlight the need for establishing clear policies to
protect human rights, involving stakeholders, and providing accessible redress
mechanisms in renewable energy projects (OHCHR, 2016) (CCSI, 2023). For
instance, the UN Guiding Principles on Business and Human Rights outline steps
companies must take to respect human rights and provide remedies for harms their
operations cause or contribute to (Amnesty, 2023). A socio-economic footprint
analysis of the energy transition performed by IRENA in South Africa and Egypt,
enhance the comprehensive assessment of renewable energy potential impacts on
environment, people and livelihoods protection and jobs creation (Box 13). Box
13: IRENA's assessment of the energy transition's socio-economic impact in South
Africa and Egypt builds on its World Energy Transitions Outlook. This effort
aims to support transition planning and informed policymaking. The South African
report showcases a wind project and the establishment of a Small-Medium
Enterprise focused on bird monitoring. This project enhanced positive socio-
economic impacts on local communities by creating new professional opportunities
for disadvantaged community members and fostering bird protection mechanisms.
Box 13: IRENA's assessment of the energy transition's socio-economic impact in
South Africa and Egypt builds on its World Energy Transitions Outlook. This
effort aims to support transition planning and informed policymaking. The South
African report showcases a wind project and the establishment of a Small-Medium
Enterprise focused on bird monitoring. This project enhanced positive socio-
economic impacts on local communities by creating new professional opportunities
for disadvantaged community members and fostering bird protection mechanisms. 3)
SDG 7.3 Energy efficiency Figure 3. Circular Sankey Chart representing synergies
and trade-offs between SDG 7.3 and other SDGs, based on the JRC SDG
Interlinkages Tool developed by the European Commission Energy efficiency is key
for achieving a balanced human development while reducing the impacts on the
planet. The right efficiency policies could enable the world to achieve more
than 40% of the emissions cuts needed to reach climate goals without new
technologies. To meet the Goal 7 and compensate for lost time, necessitates a
yearly average improvement in energy intensity of 3.2 % until 2030. Framed
within SDG 7.3, this global energy efficiency target requires significant
reductions in energy consumption, presenting both synergies and trade-offs on
global and local scales (Figure 3). Energy efficiency presents synergistic
opportunities of reducing planetary impacts and promoting sustainable societies,
managing the water-food-energy nexus, improving waste-to-energy strategies and
leveraging digitalization. Yet, adopting these measures faces challenges:
managing industrial degrowth complexities, scaling nature-based solutions for
inequality and land challenges, and closing the triple digital divide in smart
agriculture. Achieving energy efficiency requires a shift in behavioral
paradigms, reliant on sustainability education and enhanced cooperation. The
subsequent sections offer concise insights into these synergies and trade-offs,
complemented by relevant case studies for illustration. 1)     Catalyzing
Sustainability through Energy Efficiency Building Sustainable Societies through
Energy Efficiency: Energy efficiency is key to reducing several adverse effects
of the two previous SDG 7.1 and SDG 7.2. On the one hand, energy efficiency
measures can avoid the rebound effect of energy access. For instance, an
integrated solution developed by the ICLEI organization enhanced to improve
water and energy efficiency of health centers and maternity centers, addressing
together several SDG such as 3, 5, 6 and 7 (Box 14), enhancing a more positive
impact of energy access interventions. On the other side, since energy
efficiency reduces the amount of energy consumption, it has direct impacts on
reducing energy-related environmental effects on climate (SDG 13). The Green
Economic Development Project developed by the UNDP in Bosnia Herzegovina
enhanced saving 700,000 USD annually, reducing emissions of 2.200 tons of CO2
annually and creating jobs for 664 persons / month (SDG 8) (Box 15),
contributing to sustainable cities, climate, education and energy goals. Nature-
based solutions are gaining traction, counteracting heat waves and high
temperatures in urban settings. By incorporating elements like blue
infrastructure and green roofs, these approaches reduce energy consumption and
enhance urban microclimates (SDG 11) (WB, 2023) Box 14: In Rwanda, the Urban-
LEDS II pilot projects in Muhanga District and Kigali are transforming
healthcare by upgrading the Gitarama and Gahanga Health Centers. These
initiatives introduce cost-effective and sustainable systems, including
rainwater harvesting tanks and energy-efficient lighting solutions such as
solar-powered streetlights and high-pressure solar water heaters. These upgrades
aim to reduce operational costs, enhance climate resilience post-COVID-19, and
are backed by partnerships with ICLEI, a global network for sustainable urban
development. This pilot project is strengthening Rwanda's innovative, eco-
friendly healthcare solutions for a greener future. Box 14: In Rwanda, the
Urban-LEDS II pilot projects in Muhanga District and Kigali are transforming
healthcare by upgrading the Gitarama and Gahanga Health Centers. These
initiatives introduce cost-effective and sustainable systems, including
rainwater harvesting tanks and energy-efficient lighting solutions such as
solar-powered streetlights and high-pressure solar water heaters. These upgrades
aim to reduce operational costs, enhance climate resilience post-COVID-19, and
are backed by partnerships with ICLEI, a global network for sustainable urban
development. This pilot project is strengthening Rwanda's innovative, eco-
friendly healthcare solutions for a greener future. Box 15: The Green Economic
Development Project developed by the UNDP from 2012 to 2022 has improved the
energy efficiency of public buildings in Bosnia and Herzegovina for climate
comfort. It has promoted fuel switch projects, automated energy consumption
regulation and management of public-sector buildings, and implemented efficient
public lighting. Education and capacity-building on energy management of public-
sector buildings for end-users have also been provided. Box 15: The Green
Economic Development Project developed by the UNDP from 2012 to 2022 has
improved the energy efficiency of public buildings in Bosnia and Herzegovina for
climate comfort. It has promoted fuel switch projects, automated energy
consumption regulation and management of public-sector buildings, and
implemented efficient public lighting. Education and capacity-building on energy
management of public-sector buildings for end-users have also been provided.
Optimizing the Water-Food-Energy Nexus for Sustainability: The growing demand
for water (SDG 6), food (SDG 2), and energy (SDG 7) exerts immense pressure on
this interconnected nexus. For instance, shifting dietary patterns towards
water-intensive foods, coupled with an anticipated population surge to over 9
billion by 2050, necessitates a staggering 50% increase in global food
production. Agriculture, a major consumer of freshwater resources, accounts for
nearly 30% of global energy consumption. Integrated and efficient management of
water, food, and energy presents synergistic opportunities to address these
multiple challenges. Optimizing power plant operations, deploying advanced
cooling systems, and embracing energy-efficient irrigation present viable
solutions. Water services, acting as a cornerstone for demand-side energy
management, offer opportunities for power generation and storage, with
irrigation adjustments during low electricity demand periods and reduced pumping
during peaks (IEA, 2023). The intertwined nature of land, soil, and water
systems calls for comprehensive efficiency measures across the agri-food chain.
Precision irrigation guided by water providers' data and the safeguarding of
ecosystems alongside agricultural and energy production are novel solutions to
ensure environmental sustainability (UN Water, 2023). Efficient cold chain
solutions are also key for supporting food security while reducing food waste
(FAO, 2021). Waste-to-Energy Solutions: Waste-based energy generation not only
serves as an energy-efficient solution but also aligns with multiple Sustainable
Development Goals (SDGs). Connecting SDG 7.2 and 7.3, it contributes to low-
impact energy generation while addressing waste reduction, resource efficiency,
fostering innovation, and building resilient infrastructure (SDG 9, 11 and 12).
Certain bioenergy forms, derived from domestic waste, avert competition with
food production (ICSU, 2017). Technological advancements, particularly in
wastewater management, offer synergistic opportunities. The energy latent in
wastewater alone can satisfy over half of a treatment plant's electricity needs
(IEA, 2023). Implementing energy-efficient technologies reshapes consumption
patterns, fostering responsible consumption and production while minimizing
waste-associated energy consumption (ICSU, 2017). The IRENA report underscores
the potential of agricultural residue-based bioenergy in Southeast Asia, Sub-
Saharan African and South America (IRENA, 2023). UNDP’s project in Sri Lanka
promoted the use of bioenergy as a waste management strategy within the agro-
industry (Box 16). Box 16: The UNDP's project in Sri Lanka, spanning 2019 to
2023, targets sustainable energy use in the Agro-Industry to cut emissions and
boost savings. Focused on solar energy and biogas, the project exemplifies a
South-South cooperation led by China. It aims to build capacity, transfer
technology, and apply innovative waste-to-energy solutions, including converting
slurry into organic fertilizer. By showcasing energy-efficient applications,
waste management, and productivity gains, the project benefits from China's
expertise, fostering capacity development in partner countries. Box 16: The
UNDP's project in Sri Lanka, spanning 2019 to 2023, targets sustainable energy
use in the Agro-Industry to cut emissions and boost savings. Focused on solar
energy and biogas, the project exemplifies a South-South cooperation led by
China. It aims to build capacity, transfer technology, and apply innovative
waste-to-energy solutions, including converting slurry into organic fertilizer.
By showcasing energy-efficient applications, waste management, and productivity
gains, the project benefits from China's expertise, fostering capacity
development in partner countries. Digitalization for Efficiency: Integrating
digital solutions with energy infrastructure creates synergies, enabling
increased efficiency and productivity (SDG 9, 11, 12). Fourth Industrial
Revolution technologies, like real-time analytics, significantly enhance energy
efficiency and reduce waste across various channels (UNDP, 2018). Developing
nations have immense potential to adopt Industry 4.0 in manufacturing, employing
smart production tools like sensors and Artificial Intelligences (AI) to enhance
productivity and minimize environmental impact (UN, 2022). Agriculture 4.0 is
also emerging for enhanced farming practices. Agricultural automation trends
include creating specialized equipment for farming tasks and converting standard
machinery into autonomous systems (FAO, 2020). Smart cities and grids, driven by
digital tech, optimize urban infrastructure and energy networks. UNDP-supported
projects in places like Mauritius introduce smart grid solutions that automate
responses to outages and improve reliability and power quality. In Bosnia and
Herzegovina, digital tech monitors and reduces building power consumption,
critical for emissions reduction. Tracking energy use and emissions in 75% of
buildings aids in efficient planning and disaster mitigation (Box 15) (UNDP,
2023). 2)      Developing Informed Strategies for Energy Efficiency Trade-offs
Mitigating Development Degrowth: Mitigating industrial degrowth in developing
nations while pursuing SDG 7.3 involves a delicate balance. Prioritizing energy
efficiency must not impede industrial progress but rather encourage sustainable
development and industrialization. Concerns arise around the early retirement of
fossil energy infrastructure, where policies like carbon pricing can aid
innovation and compliance in the industrial sector (SDG 9) (ICSU, 2017).
Implementing energy-from-waste strategies, such as fuels produced from domestic
waste, requires energy-intensive transportation of waste residues and operation
of agrofuel processing plants (ICSU, 2017). To avoid trade-offs, an integrated
approach across the entire value chain is required. Moreover, defining energy
efficiency strategies poses challenges due to varied definitions and their
multifaceted impacts UNESCWA, 2016). While focusing on resource losses,
efficiency measures need a more comprehensive view, integrating social,
environmental, and sustainability factors. The nexus approach allows examining
productivity in sectors such energy and water production, emphasizing
decentralized generation and optimizing the entire supply chain, ensuring
resource value is maximized. Scaling Nature-Based Solutions for Addressing
Inequality and Land Challenges: Nature-based solutions stand as a promising
avenue for scaling up energy efficiency. However, the substantial land
requirements of large-scale nature-based solutions, especially for climate
change mitigation (i.e. carbon capture solutions), necessitate concurrent
measures to alleviate land pressure, such as shifts in food systems and
agriculture, to prevent potential conflicts. Inclusive design becomes critical
considering the historical impact on marginalized communities amid land and
climate changes. Challenges to wider adoption include limitations in ecosystem
services, monitoring difficulties, and varying societal perceptions of climate
risks (WWF, 2020). Mitigating potential trade-offs and avoiding exacerbating
climate issues and social injustices require integrated, bottom-up approaches.
UNDP's initiatives, particularly in tackling deforestation through nature-based
solutions, exemplify this comprehensive strategy (Box 17). Box 17: In Angola,
where 88% of the multidimensionally poor reside in rural areas facing threats
from deforestation and traditional energy usage, the UNDP collaborates with the
government to address this critical issue. Angola's 2020-2022 development
priority emphasizes natural resource management for conservation and economic
growth. UNDP's approach involves integrated, nature-based solutions targeting
deforestation and forest degradation. Efforts concentrate on sustainable forest
management, notably community-based forestry, and enhancing the sustainability
of the charcoal value chain. This includes promoting sustainable charcoal
consumption practices in cities and integrating sustainability criteria into
government policies, fostering long-term environmental preservation and
benefiting rural communities. Box 17: In Angola, where 88% of the
multidimensionally poor reside in rural areas facing threats from deforestation
and traditional energy usage, the UNDP collaborates with the government to
address this critical issue. Angola's 2020-2022 development priority emphasizes
natural resource management for conservation and economic growth. UNDP's
approach involves integrated, nature-based solutions targeting deforestation and
forest degradation. Efforts concentrate on sustainable forest management,
notably community-based forestry, and enhancing the sustainability of the
charcoal value chain. This includes promoting sustainable charcoal consumption
practices in cities and integrating sustainability criteria into government
policies, fostering long-term environmental preservation and benefiting rural
communities. Closing the Triple Digital Divide in Agriculture 4.0: Despite the
promises of increased efficiency through digitalization and smart-agriculture
innovations (SDG 2 and 9), challenges persist. Issues like data management,
technology operation, and affordability hinder widespread adoption, particularly
among small-scale farmers. Innovative approaches like service provision and
cooperative ownership offer potential solutions to enhance accessibility. UNDP's
Africa Minigrids Program utilizes digital innovation to scale solar minigrids,
ensuring affordability through remote monitoring and real-time consumption
tracking (Box 18). Agriculture 4.0 heavily relies on Information and
Communication Technologies (ICTs), yet access to robust IT infrastructure
remains a challenge, especially in rural areas of developing nations (FAO,
2020). Engaging youth, and particularly women (SDG 5), in Agriculture 4.0 and
green economy initiatives presents opportunities for innovation and
entrepreneurship, but necessitate a gender-responsive approach to overcome
gender gaps in technology access and resource dependency pose challenges (UN
Women Africa, 2023). To address these disparities, UN Women's study aims to
minimize the triple divide impacting women and prepare youth for inclusive,
environmentally sensitive livelihoods through gender-responsive programs
integrated into climate-smart agriculture solutions (Box 19). Box 18: UNDP's
Africa Minigrids Program operates in 21 sub-Saharan countries, utilizing digital
innovation to scale solar minigrids and revolutionize energy markets. This
program is specifically aimed at early-stage minigrid markets, aiming to create
an environment conducive to substantial private investment. Its goal is to
enhance access to clean energy by bolstering the financial viability and
encouraging significant commercial investment in renewable energy minigrids
across Africa. The program focuses on cost-reduction strategies and innovative
business models to achieve these objectives. Box 18: UNDP's Africa Minigrids
Program operates in 21 sub-Saharan countries, utilizing digital innovation to
scale solar minigrids and revolutionize energy markets. This program is
specifically aimed at early-stage minigrid markets, aiming to create an
environment conducive to substantial private investment. Its goal is to enhance
access to clean energy by bolstering the financial viability and encouraging
significant commercial investment in renewable energy minigrids across Africa.
The program focuses on cost-reduction strategies and innovative business models
to achieve these objectives. Box 19: In exploring opportunities for youth in
agriculture across Mozambique, Rwanda, and Uganda, UN Women East and Southern
Africa Regional Office (ESARO) emphasizes addressing challenges hindering youth
engagement, notably gender inequality, limited access to resources, and the
digital divide. Their report highlights disparities in job access within the
agriculture sector, proposing comprehensive recommendations. These suggestions
span capacity development in digital and business skills, quality assurance,
intellectual rights protection, soil health, renewable energy, and
agroecological farming. The focus extends to narrowing the digital divide,
promoting gender equality, inclusive business models, and investing in tailored
technologies for sustainable agriculture. Ultimately, these efforts aim to
bolster youth opportunities while ensuring gender-inclusive, energy-efficient,
and sustainable growth in the agricultural landscape. Box 19: In exploring
opportunities for youth in agriculture across Mozambique, Rwanda, and Uganda, UN
Women East and Southern Africa Regional Office (ESARO) emphasizes addressing
challenges hindering youth engagement, notably gender inequality, limited access
to resources, and the digital divide. Their report highlights disparities in job
access within the agriculture sector, proposing comprehensive recommendations.
These suggestions span capacity development in digital and business skills,
quality assurance, intellectual rights protection, soil health, renewable
energy, and agroecological farming. The focus extends to narrowing the digital
divide, promoting gender equality, inclusive business models, and investing in
tailored technologies for sustainable agriculture. Ultimately, these efforts aim
to bolster youth opportunities while ensuring gender-inclusive, energy-
efficient, and sustainable growth in the agricultural landscape. Sustainability
Education for Shaping a Greener Future: Effective achievement of energy
efficiency goals demands broad cooperation (SDG 17) and necessitates education
on sustainability (SDG 12). Creating widespread awareness and understanding
among governments, industries, and communities is paramount for success (WEF,
2023). While technology is essential, influencing consumer behavior
significantly impacts energy savings. Successful energy efficiency initiatives
require a mix of technology-driven solutions and a deep understanding of human
behavior. This emphasizes tailored, cost-effective approaches, continual
evaluation, and engagement with communication experts in crafting effective
behavior change campaigns. Behavioral approaches can reshape energy efficiency
programs, focusing on behavior change and gender equality. These programs need
to consider local contexts and consumer data, possibly integrating them into
broader interventions (ESMAP, 2020). Education on energy efficiency encourages
the development of technologies that minimize energy wastage and promotes
collaborative research into renewable and clean energy resources (UNESCO, 2023)
Overcoming challenges involves inclusive capacity-building efforts across
sectors, focusing on individuals regardless of age or gender, particularly
targeting women and youth (SDG 5) (FAO, 2020). TAKE-HOME MESSAGES •     Access
to electricity and clean cooking acts as a catalyst for achieving multiple SDGs,
facilitating educational opportunities, bridging the digital divide,
transforming health services, addressing water stress, bolstering food security
and productive development, and narrowing the gender gaps. Special attention
must be given to balancing energy affordability and sufficiency, ensuring
sustainable battery management, and applying an inclusive, gender-responsive
lens to leave no one behind. • Renewable energies pave the way for sustainable
prosperity, contributing to the synergistic fight against climate change,
creating healthier cities, and fostering resilient societies. These
technological solutions require a holistic approach to manage potential trade-
offs, such as water security challenges, balancing land use and food security,
considering the entire environmental footprint of the green energy value chain,
and ensuring governance and community rights. •      Energy efficiency
represents a highly advantageous strategy capable of catalyzing sustainability
by building sustainable societies, optimizing the water-food-energy nexus,
transforming the energy sector and industry through waste-to-energy solutions
and digitalization. However, attention is needed to avoid development degrowth,
to mitigate scaled impacts of large-scale initiatives such as nature-based
solutions, to engage society through capacity-building and reduce inequalities
through digitalization. TAKE-HOME MESSAGES •        Access to electricity and
clean cooking acts as a catalyst for achieving multiple SDGs, facilitating
educational opportunities, bridging the digital divide, transforming health
services, addressing water stress, bolstering food security and productive
development, and narrowing the gender gaps. Special attention must be given to
balancing energy affordability and sufficiency, ensuring sustainable battery
management, and applying an inclusive, gender-responsive lens to leave no one
behind. • Renewable energies pave the way for sustainable prosperity,
contributing to the synergistic fight against climate change, creating healthier
cities, and fostering resilient societies. These technological solutions require
a holistic approach to manage potential trade-offs, such as water security
challenges, balancing land use and food security, considering the entire
environmental footprint of the green energy value chain, and ensuring governance
and community rights. •      Energy efficiency represents a highly advantageous
strategy capable of catalyzing sustainability by building sustainable societies,
optimizing the water-food-energy nexus, transforming the energy sector and
industry through waste-to-energy solutions and digitalization. However,
attention is needed to avoid development degrowth, to mitigate scaled impacts of
large-scale initiatives such as nature-based solutions, to engage society
through capacity-building and reduce inequalities through digitalization. 2)
Approaches, Methods and Tools for Strategic Innovation This chapter explores
ways to uncover system interconnections and foster integration across the SDGs.
It aims at equipping participants with an understanding of why a focus on system
interconnections is key for achieving sustainable development, what coherent
policymaking entails, and what are some specific approaches, methods and tools
that can be employed to foster SDGs interlinkages. Approaches are intended to
guide the overarching strategy, methods define the step-by-step procedures, and
tools provide the means to execute those procedures effectively within the
chosen approach and method. For instance, the UNDP’s Knowledge Bank offers a
one-stop-shop resource platform, including the SDG Integration tools and the SDG
Acceleration Toolkit by the UNSDG, serving as a comprehensive support hub for
achieving the Global Goals (SDG Acceleration Toolkit) SDG Acceleration Toolkit:
The SDG Acceleration Toolkit is a compendium of tools for analysing system
interconnections, enhancing policy coherence, ensuring that no one is left
behind, identifying risks and building resilience. Originally launched in 2017
by the United Nations Sustainable Development Group (UNSDG), this refreshed
version of the Toolkit is designed to provide UN Country Teams, policy experts
and Governments with access to existing tools for accelerating progress toward
the 2030 Agenda. The tools can also support immediate socio-economic response to
the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as effective recovery planning and
implementation. The Toolkit is managed jointly by UNICEF and UNDP under the
auspices of the UNSDG Task Team on Integrated Policy Support. SDG Acceleration
Toolkit: The SDG Acceleration Toolkit is a compendium of tools for analysing
system interconnections, enhancing policy coherence, ensuring that no one is
left behind, identifying risks and building resilience. Originally launched in
2017 by the United Nations Sustainable Development Group (UNSDG), this refreshed
version of the Toolkit is designed to provide UN Country Teams, policy experts
and Governments with access to existing tools for accelerating progress toward
the 2030 Agenda. The tools can also support immediate socio-economic response to
the COVID-19 pandemic, as well as effective recovery planning and
implementation. The Toolkit is managed jointly by UNICEF and UNDP under the
auspices of the UNSDG Task Team on Integrated Policy Support. 1)     Approaches
This section introduces a range of approaches aimed at enhancing the
comprehensive understanding of interconnected SDGs while operationalizing
actions toward achieving multiple goals. These approaches serve as overarching
strategies used to address complex problems, offering broad guidance on how to
approach multifaceted issues. Specifically, it explores four complementary
approaches within Sustainable Energy Initiatives. These include the System
Thinking approach, aiding in understanding issues as interconnected systems;
Gender Mainstreaming, which incorporates gender as an analytical variable,
involving gender-responsive initiatives, policies, and actions; the Human
Rights-Based Approach, emphasizing the fulfillment of human rights; and the
Portfolio Approach, transitioning from isolated projects to an interconnected
network through experiential learning. 1)     System Thinking Approach What is
it? An approach that views issues as interconnected systems rather than isolated
parts. How does it work? It considers the relationships and feedback loops
between various components within a system, examining how different parts
interact and influence each other. Why apply it? It provides a holistic view of
complex issues, identifies underlying causes, targets leverage points for
effective interventions, and facilitates stakeholder identification and
engagement. Figure 4: 10-step participatory Systems Thinking Approach, tailored
for UNESCAP sustainability outlook reports (UNESCAP, 2020) Systems thinking
perceives issues as intricate systems rather than isolated elements, exploring
interconnections and feedback loops among components. It aims to understand
complex systems comprehensively, identifying stakeholders and their roles,
uncovering root causes, pinpointing leverage points for impactful changes, and
revealing interdependencies. It empowers policymakers to devise effective
interventions by grasping driving forces within systems. Implementation involves
recognizing boundaries, mapping interconnectedness, and using tools like system
dynamics or causal loop diagrams. This approach requires a shift from viewing
problems as isolated incidents to systemic constructs. Beneficial across the
project cycle, especially in early stages for understanding complexity and
during implementation for dynamic intervention adjustments, systems thinking
offers a holistic view, addressing underlying causes and facilitating
stakeholder engagement inclusively (UNSSC, 2020) (UNESCAP, 2015) (UNFCCC, 2015)
(UNU-FLORES, 2015. 2)     Gender Mainstreaming What is it? An approach that
considers gender as an analytical variable, entailing a shift from gender-
neutral to gender-responsive initiatives, policies, actions or processes. How
does it work? Gender mainstreaming embodies the integration of a gender
perspective across the entire spectrum of planning, implementation, monitoring,
and evaluation within policies, programs, and actions spanning all sectors and
levels Why apply it? It promotes gender equality by identifying and addressing
disparities, ensuring equal benefits from policies and programs, and promoting
inclusivity. Figure 5: UNIDO’s guide for Gender Mainstreaming at the different
project cycle stages (UNIDO, 2021) Gender mainstreaming integrates a gender
perspective into planning, implementation, monitoring, and evaluation across
sectors and levels, ensuring women's and men's concerns become integral in
initiatives to foster equality. Its core aim is to advance gender equality by
identifying disparities and ensuring policies equally benefit both genders,
eradicating discrimination. This methodical approach analyzes policies for
gender implications, addresses gaps using data, implements gender-responsive
actions, and monitors progress through sex-disaggregated and gender indicators,
incorporating gender perspectives at every stage. Throughout the project cycle,
from design to evaluation, gender mainstreaming ensures equitable program
benefits, opposes discriminatory practices, amplifies initiative effectiveness
through diverse perspectives, and aligns closely with the UN Charter's values of
equality and inclusivity. (WEF, 2023) (UN, 2022) (UNIDO, 2021) (UNEP & EmPower,
2020) (UN Women & UNIDO, 2023). Data: The Gender Gap Report – World Economic
Forum The Global Gender Gap Report, initiated by the World Economic Forum in
2006, benchmarks gender parity in economic opportunities, education, health, and
political leadership across 146 countries. It measures parity scores between men
and women, with a score of 1 indicating full parity. The report aids strategic
planning and policy by identifying disparities and trends, offering a vital tool
throughout the project cycle for achieving global gender equality. Data: The
Gender Gap Report – World Economic Forum The Global Gender Gap Report, initiated
by the World Economic Forum in 2006, benchmarks gender parity in economic
opportunities, education, health, and political leadership across 146 countries.
It measures parity scores between men and women, with a score of 1 indicating
full parity. The report aids strategic planning and policy by identifying
disparities and trends, offering a vital tool throughout the project cycle for
achieving global gender equality. Indicators: Addressing Energy’s Interlinkages
with other SDGs The SDG 7 Policy Briefs compilation, "Addressing Energy's
Interlinkages to Other SDGs" developed by the SDG7 Technical Advisory Group
(SDG7 TAG), delves into how energy access intertwines with SDG 5 (gender
equality), identifying potential indicators and assessing data availability.
This report porposes a set of indicators to measure the gender gap in term of:
access to electricity and clean cooking, employment and leadership, energy
entrepreneurship, and the regulatory environment. Indicators: Addressing
Energy’s Interlinkages with other SDGs The SDG 7 Policy Briefs compilation,
"Addressing Energy's Interlinkages to Other SDGs" developed by the SDG7
Technical Advisory Group (SDG7 TAG), delves into how energy access intertwines
with SDG 5 (gender equality), identifying potential indicators and assessing
data availability. This report porposes a set of indicators to measure the
gender gap in term of: access to electricity and clean cooking, employment and
leadership, energy entrepreneurship, and the regulatory environment. 3)
Human Rights-Based Approach What is it? An approach emphasizing the fulfillment
of human rights, shifting the focus from basic needs to rights. How does it
work? It integrated human rights principles across all phases of development
cooperation, aligns programming with international standards, and focuses on
capacity building for both duty bearers and rights holders. Why apply it? It
promotes equality, justice, and dignity for all, by addressing inequalities and
discrimination at the root level. It empowers individuals and communities to
claim their rights and enhances accountability and transparency in governance.
Figure 6: Example of Human Rights-Based Approach applied in Ecosystem-based
Adaptation (EbA) (UNEP, 2022) Human Rights-Based Approaches (HRBA) are deeply
rooted in international human rights standards, aimed at safeguarding human
rights within developmental landscapes. It emphasizes realizing human rights
outlined in international agreements to rectify discriminatory practices and
rebalance power dynamics hindering comprehensive development. HRBA aims to
foster equality, justice, and dignity beyond basic needs, transforming the
narrative towards holistic rights fulfillment. It strengthens government
capacities to honor rights obligations and empowers communities and individuals
to claim their rights. Implementing HRBA entails integrating human rights
principles across development stages, aligning programs with international
standards, and capacity-building for duty bearers and rights holders. Integrated
throughout the project cycle, HRBA ensures program alignment with human rights
principles from planning to monitoring, enabling redress for violations and
fostering engagement. Its advantages encompass shifting focus from needs to
rights, empowering stakeholders, enhancing governance transparency, addressing
inequalities, and averting adverse human rights impacts, culminating in a
framework prioritizing rights fulfillment and fostering equality, justice, and
dignity for all (UNFPA, 2023) (UNSDG, 2023) (UNSDG, 2003). Frameworks: The
"Leave No One Behind" (LNOB) The "Leave No One Behind" (LNOB) framework
prioritizes marginalized communities in development, fostering their
participation and addressing discrimination and exclusion. It integrates Human
Rights-based and Gender Mainstreaming strategies, targeting inequalities at
intersections of various criteria. Its methodology involves identifying excluded
groups, prioritizing actions, designing indicators, and ensuring accountability.
Outcomes include identifying vulnerabilities, crafting targeted policies,
selecting monitoring indicators, and establishing accountability mechanisms. The
framework champions rights, exposes inequalities, promotes inclusive processes,
and ensures intervention accountability for marginalized groups in development
initiatives. Frameworks: The "Leave No One Behind" (LNOB) The "Leave No One
Behind" (LNOB) framework prioritizes marginalized communities in development,
fostering their participation and addressing discrimination and exclusion. It
integrates Human Rights-based and Gender Mainstreaming strategies, targeting
inequalities at intersections of various criteria. Its methodology involves
identifying excluded groups, prioritizing actions, designing indicators, and
ensuring accountability. Outcomes include identifying vulnerabilities, crafting
targeted policies, selecting monitoring indicators, and establishing
accountability mechanisms. The framework champions rights, exposes inequalities,
promotes inclusive processes, and ensures intervention accountability for
marginalized groups in development initiatives. References: (UNDP SES Toolkit,
2023) (UN, 2017) (UNSDG, 2022) (FAO, 2023) 4)    Portfolio Approach What is it?
This systemic approach involves transitioning from isolated projects to an
interconnected network of interventions fostering self-transformation and
resilience, promoting adaptability amid uncertainties and risks through
experiential learning How does it work? This approach creates interconnected
interventions targeting systemic change. It navigates uncertainty by engaging in
iterative experimentation with complex issues. It begins without defined
outcomes, employs discussions with stakeholders to embrace uncertainty, and
relies on teamwork for rapid adaptation and management of unpredictable risks
Why apply it? This approach facilitates evidence-based planning and decision-
making in systems with dense interactions and relationships, especially for
addressing dynamic issues. It aims to bolster community resilience, champion
justice, and empower societies to confidently confront uncertainty, utilizing
flexible interventions to effectively tackle complex issues. Figure 7: “How to
design a Portfolio through Practice?” Structure of a System Change (UNDP Unstuck
website) The portfolio approach is a dynamic process fostering learning within
human systems. It involves creating interconnected interventions that actively
build community capabilities, relationships, and narratives through experiential
learning. These portfolios enhance adaptive capacity, fostering systemic change
known as self-transformation, empowering communities and societies to navigate
uncertainties confidently. Exploration involves engaging stakeholders,
uncovering connections, and building a shared vision within the context.
Development of Options creates interventions stimulating different aspects of
human systems and adapts outcomes to new learnings, aiming for self-
transformation within the system. Ignition for Self-Transformation uses
interventions as active learning experiences, building confidence and turning
learning into policies and cooperation, ultimately building adaptive
capabilities within human systems (UNDP, 2023) (UNDP, 2022) (UNDP Unstuck
website) Sustainable Energy Hub’s portfolio approach for UNDP Energy Moonshot:
UNDP has established internal monitoring systems to track collective progress
toward achieving the Energy Moonshot. The Tracker analysis aims to identify
direct and indirect beneficiaries across all active UNDP energy projects aligned
with the 2022-2025 Strategic Plan. Led by the Sustainable Energy Hub, efforts
are underway to monitor and map the UNDP's portfolio of 320 energy-related
projects. These projects encompass a diverse range, including on-grid and off-
grid renewable electricity, solar home systems, clean cooking, and support for
e-mobility. A devised methodology converts project outputs into quantifiable
measures for direct and indirect beneficiaries. This initiative aims to monitor
the UNDP's progress, provide global energy-related data to UNDP Country Offices
and the organization as a whole, foster collaboration with partners for
collective efforts, and integrate the Energy Moonshot with other initiatives for
a cohesive approach. Sustainable Energy Hub’s portfolio approach for UNDP Energy
Moonshot: UNDP has established internal monitoring systems to track collective
progress toward achieving the Energy Moonshot. The Tracker analysis aims to
identify direct and indirect beneficiaries across all active UNDP energy
projects aligned with the 2022-2025 Strategic Plan. Led by the Sustainable
Energy Hub, efforts are underway to monitor and map the UNDP's portfolio of 320
energy-related projects. These projects encompass a diverse range, including on-
grid and off-grid renewable electricity, solar home systems, clean cooking, and
support for e-mobility. A devised methodology converts project outputs into
quantifiable measures for direct and indirect beneficiaries. This initiative
aims to monitor the UNDP's progress, provide global energy-related data to UNDP
Country Offices and the organization as a whole, foster collaboration with
partners for collective efforts, and integrate the Energy Moonshot with other
initiatives for a cohesive approach. 2)   Methods and Tools This section
explores key methodologies and tools that drive integrated actions for
addressing interlinked SDG challenges. Methods offer structured procedures to
achieve specific outcomes, while tools are the tangible resources facilitating
method execution within an approach. A comprehensive overview of integrated
mechanisms is provided to support Strategic Innovation. The Water-Food-Energy-
Ecosystem Nexus, presented to exemplify the Nexus method, enhance a systemic
analysis of specific SDGs interlinkages. Life Cycle Assessment provides a
systemic perspective, accounting for socio-environmental impacts throughout
initiatives' cycles. Multi-Criteria Decision Analysis methods aid in strategic
multi-objective decision-making amid conflicting outcomes. Scenario Thinking
visualizes outcomes from integrated strategies, while the Theory of Change
operationalizes expected changes considering systemic interactions. These
methodologies cover various aspects, from envisioning future scenarios to
evaluating interventions and fostering ongoing learning and partnerships. The
section also explores the landscape of opportunities within digital
intelligence, leveraging Artificial Intelligence mechanisms and introducing key
tools. 1)  The Water-Energy-Food-Ecosystem Nexus The WEFE Nexus, integrating
water, energy, food, and ecosystems, fosters sustainable development by
acknowledging their global and local interdependence and their impact on
quantity, quality, and access. This approach promotes integrated solutions
aligned with sustainable development goals, emphasizing efficient resource use
and stakeholder dialogue for policy coherence across sectors and governments.
Employing a decision-making framework grounded in systems thinking, it
identifies cross-sectorial impacts, explores trade-offs, and guides development
pathways towards resource efficiency, equity, and sustainability at various
governance levels. Its versatility spans the project cycle, aiding in planning,
design, implementation, monitoring, and evaluation. Stakeholder dialogues,
scenarios, and response options drive this approach, facilitating integrated
planning, decision-making, and cost-effective implementation. Methods range from
qualitative indicators-based approaches to operational systems, chosen based on
data availability, scale of impacts, stakeholder involvement, and communication
needs. This assessment process enhances understanding of sector interactions,
leading to optimal solutions feeding into policy dialogues, contingent on
contextual factors, capacities, and constructive dialogues. Advantages include
its ability to address interconnected challenges, develop comprehensive policy
responses, and create integrated policies and practices addressing crosscutting
challenges for both immediate needs and long-term goals. This approach leverages
co-benefits, enhances resource productivity, resilience, and policy coherence,
stimulating investments in sustainable infrastructure and ecosystem preservation
(UNSGAB, 2014) (UNFCCC, 2015) (UNESCO, 2021) (SDG Asia Pacific, 2023) (UN et
al., 2023) (Nexus, 2020). Framework: JRC & UNESCO’s WEFE Nexus Framework In
2018, the European Commission’s Joint Research Centre (JRC) and UNESCO’s
Intergovernmental Hydrological Programme (IHP) initiated the
"Water–Energy–Food–Ecosystems (WEFE) Nexus: Analyzing solutions for security
supply" project amid water, energy, and food constraints. Framework: JRC &
UNESCO’s WEFE Nexus Framework In 2018, the European Commission’s Joint Research
Centre (JRC) and UNESCO’s Intergovernmental Hydrological Programme (IHP)
initiated the "Water–Energy–Food–Ecosystems (WEFE) Nexus: Analyzing solutions
for security supply" project amid water, energy, and food constraints. Figure 8:
UNESCO’s WEFE Nexus Framework (UNESCO, 2021) Tools: SDG Climate Action Nexus
Tool; UNESCWA WEF Regional Policy Toolkit Indicators: Water-Energy-and-Food-
Security-Nexus Indicator Tools: SDG Climate Action Nexus Tool; UNESCWA WEF
Regional Policy Toolkit Indicators: Water-Energy-and-Food-Security-Nexus
Indicator Tool: UNESCWA Input-Output Analysis for Nexus Assessment Input-output
analysis links economic, social, and environmental aspects of trade and
investment, revealing resource usage impacts across production chains to final
consumers. UNESCWA employs a modelling approach to estimate interlinkages among
sustainable development goals, using a production function akin to input-output
systems. The method yields interlinkage matrices, aiding the assessment of
external variables' impact. Its advantages include the swift development of
econometric models encompassing numerous indicators and data. Tool: UNESCWA
Input-Output Analysis for Nexus Assessment Input-output analysis links economic,
social, and environmental aspects of trade and investment, revealing resource
usage impacts across production chains to final consumers. UNESCWA employs a
modelling approach to estimate interlinkages among sustainable development
goals, using a production function akin to input-output systems. The method
yields interlinkage matrices, aiding the assessment of external variables'
impact. Its advantages include the swift development of econometric models
encompassing numerous indicators and data. Tool: International Science Council’s
Tool for Mapping Nexus This guide visually analyzes SDG interactions, using a
seven-point scale to quantify synergies and conflicts among goals and targets.
Scores range from +3 (strong reinforcement) to -3 (conflict). Key dimensions
like time, geography, governance, technology, and directionality define these
interactions. The method generates an interaction matrix, visualized to assess
how goals like Zero Hunger, Good Health, Affordable Clean Energy, and Life Below
Water interact with others. Tool: International Science Council’s Tool for
Mapping Nexus This guide visually analyzes SDG interactions, using a seven-point
scale to quantify synergies and conflicts among goals and targets. Scores range
from +3 (strong reinforcement) to -3 (conflict). Key dimensions like time,
geography, governance, technology, and directionality define these interactions.
The method generates an interaction matrix, visualized to assess how goals like
Zero Hunger, Good Health, Affordable Clean Energy, and Life Below Water interact
with others. 2)  Life Cycle Assessment Life Cycle Assessment (LCA) is a
systematic method assessing the environmental impacts of a product or service
throughout its life cycle, considering stages from extraction to disposal. It
evaluates resource use, emissions, and social implications, aiding
sustainability across SDGs. LCA informs decision-making, identifies improvement
areas, and promotes sustainable practices. Its implementation involves defining
goals, conducting inventory, assessing impacts, and interpreting results using
specific tools. Integrated in early project stages, LCA guides design and
development, ensuring environmental considerations from the start. The
advantages include providing a holistic view, enabling informed decisions,
identifying improvement areas, promoting sustainability, and allowing
comparative analysis between options (RIT, 2020) (NREL, 2023) (UNEP, 2023) (Life
Cycle Initiative, 2023). Figure 9: Processes considered through the Life Cycle
perspective (Life Cycle Initiative, 2023) 3)     Multi-Criteria Decision
Analysis frameworks Multi-Criteria Analysis (MCA) is a decision-making framework
that evaluates alternatives influenced by diverse, conflicting factors. It
integrates different metrics, particularly helpful for non-monetary impacts,
aiding evaluations amidst conflicting objectives. Through individual criteria,
it provides overall performance indicators for alternatives, allowing
comparative assessments. By ranking options based on established criteria, MCA
guides project evaluation and decision-making phases, offering insights into
trade-offs among alternatives. Its strengths lie in enabling non-monetary impact
comparison and systematically evaluating conflicting factors to identify stable
solutions in complex decision problems (WB, 2023) (IAEA) 4)  Scenario Thinking:
Scenario Thinking is a qualitative method visualizing plausible futures,
providing narratives about potential developments in a specific region or issue.
It's designed to explore diverse future possibilities amidst uncertainty and
engages stakeholders in envisioning sustainable development pathways. This
approach addresses complexity, encourages stakeholder collaboration, supports
quantitative analysis, and creates compelling narratives about achieving
sustainable development goals. Utilizing participatory exercises, it generates
qualitative storylines, engages stakeholders, integrates sustainable development
dimensions, and identifies short-/medium-/long-term effects of interventions.
The outcomes involve narratives envisioning potential pathways for sustainable
development, aiding stakeholders in envisioning multiple futures and addressing
complex problems, fostering collaboration, supporting quantitative analysis, and
offering engaging narratives about sustainable societies (UNESCAP, 2015) (SDGs
UN, 2016). 5)  Theory of Change A Theory of Change method explains how
interventions drive specific development changes based on causal analysis and
evidence. It clarifies pathways from outputs to outcomes, aiding in planning and
evaluating initiatives. This approach tackles complex problems, supports
learning cycles, fosters partnerships, and acts as a concise communication tool.
By outlining causal pathways, identifying needs and assumptions, and engaging
partners, it helps understand and address underlying challenges. When applied to
SDGs, it helps in understanding the interconnections between actions and
impacts, aiding in the planning and evaluation of initiatives. The Theory of
Change methodology involves a consultative and evidence-based approach, focusing
on continuous learning and improvement while ensuring clarity and quality in
program design and implementation. This method guides program design and fosters
continuous learning and partnership development (UNEP, 2023)(UNICEF)(UNSDG).
Case Study: Accès aux services énergétiques, Niger, UNDP Case Study: Accès aux
services énergétiques, Niger, UNDP 6)  Digital Intelligence: Machine Learning,
Deep Learning and Artificial Intelligence Tool: Energy Moonshot AI Data Platform
(UNDP) To bring clean energy to 500 million more people by 2025 and drive the
shift to renewables, a fresh approach is vital. The Energy Moonshot AI Data
Platform is breaking new ground, combining AI and geospatial data to offer
unparalleled insights for energy projects worldwide. This tool empowers local
action, tapping into global innovation. Refined by using cutting-edge
technology, like Large Language Models, it supports technical officers and
development efforts by providing energy insights. Automation features optimize
project monitoring and reporting, offering live beneficiary updates. Through
collaboration, this platform aims to seamlessly integrate AI advancements into
energy policy and planning. Tool: Energy Moonshot AI Data Platform (UNDP) To
bring clean energy to 500 million more people by 2025 and drive the shift to
renewables, a fresh approach is vital. The Energy Moonshot AI Data Platform is
breaking new ground, combining AI and geospatial data to offer unparalleled
insights for energy projects worldwide. This tool empowers local action, tapping
into global innovation. Refined by using cutting-edge technology, like Large
Language Models, it supports technical officers and development efforts by
providing energy insights. Automation features optimize project monitoring and
reporting, offering live beneficiary updates. Through collaboration, this
platform aims to seamlessly integrate AI advancements into energy policy and
planning. Tool: SDG Push Diagnostic (UNDP) The UNDP's SDG Push initiative aims
to drive COVID-recovery by exploring pathways toward achieving the SDGs by 2030.
Their SDG Push Diagnostic offers reports from 94 countries, presenting
development landscapes and policy choices made within fiscal constraints. This
dynamic visualization tool integrates multiple data sources to analyze SDG
trends, national priorities, and interlinkages, outlining potential pathways
beyond 2030. It provides insights into challenges, growth trajectories,
environmental sustainability, and inclusiveness (SDG Moment), aligns national
priorities with SDGs using machine learning (Trends & Priorities), maps
synergies and trade-offs for policy pathways (SDG Interlinkages), and offers
fiscal insights and stimulus options for progress acceleration (Finance &
Stimulus). This comprehensive approach leverages data, AI, and systems
intelligence to support countries in accelerating progress toward the SDGs Tool:
SDG Push Diagnostic (UNDP) The UNDP's SDG Push initiative aims to drive COVID-
recovery by exploring pathways toward achieving the SDGs by 2030. Their SDG Push
Diagnostic offers reports from 94 countries, presenting development landscapes
and policy choices made within fiscal constraints. This dynamic visualization
tool integrates multiple data sources to analyze SDG trends, national
priorities, and interlinkages, outlining potential pathways beyond 2030. It
provides insights into challenges, growth trajectories, environmental
sustainability, and inclusiveness (SDG Moment), aligns national priorities with
SDGs using machine learning (Trends & Priorities), maps synergies and trade-offs
for policy pathways (SDG Interlinkages), and offers fiscal insights and stimulus
options for progress acceleration (Finance & Stimulus). This comprehensive
approach leverages data, AI, and systems intelligence to support countries in
accelerating progress toward the SDGs TAKE-HOME MESSAGES •        Four
approaches can revolutionize the way projects are designed, implemented, and
evaluated, simultaneously addressing the world's primary challenges. System
thinking views issues as interconnected systems rather than isolated parts,
allowing a holistic understanding of the problems. Gender mainstreaming is the
recipe for gender equality, necessitating the consideration of gender as an
analytical variable throughout the project, program or policy cycle. A human
rights-based approach ensures the fulfillment of people-centered goals, shifting
the focus from basic needs to rights. The portfolio approach involves developing
an interconnected network of interventions instead of isolated projects,
promoting synergetic solutions and ensuring adaptability to uncertainties and
resilience. •        Methods and tools serve as the operational backbone for
nexus projects: Water-energy-food nexus methods are crucial for advancing water,
food, and energy security simultaneously; Life cycle assessments allow viewing
the entire system cycle for sustainable decision-making; Multi-criteria tools
enable balancing conflicting criteria in the decision-making process,
incorporating stakeholder perspectives; Scenario thinking visualizes the impacts
of decisions; Theory of change articulates the steps driving desired changes;
and Digital intelligence emerges as the tool for big data-driven decision-
making, allowing accurate predictions and data patterns identification. TAKE-
HOME MESSAGES •       Four approaches can revolutionize the way projects are
designed, implemented, and evaluated, simultaneously addressing the world's
primary challenges. System thinking views issues as interconnected systems
rather than isolated parts, allowing a holistic understanding of the problems.
Gender mainstreaming is the recipe for gender equality, necessitating the
consideration of gender as an analytical variable throughout the project,
program or policy cycle. A human rights-based approach ensures the fulfillment
of people-centered goals, shifting the focus from basic needs to rights. The
portfolio approach involves developing an interconnected network of
interventions instead of isolated projects, promoting synergetic solutions and
ensuring adaptability to uncertainties and resilience. •        Methods and
tools serve as the operational backbone for nexus projects: Water-energy-food
nexus methods are crucial for advancing water, food, and energy security
simultaneously; Life cycle assessments allow viewing the entire system cycle for
sustainable decision-making; Multi-criteria tools enable balancing conflicting
criteria in the decision-making process, incorporating stakeholder perspectives;
Scenario thinking visualizes the impacts of decisions; Theory of change
articulates the steps driving desired changes; and Digital intelligence emerges
as the tool for big data-driven decision-making, allowing accurate predictions
and data patterns identification. 3) Partnership and Collaboration for
Development Financing The previous section explored Sustainable Energy's links
with other SDGs and integrated methodologies. SDG 7.a stresses funding and
collaboration for clean energy, while SDG 17 underscores strengthening global
partnerships for Sustainable Development. Enhanced partnerships accelerate SDG
progress by leveraging synergies and avoiding trade-offs. Across contexts,
organizations, and projects, international partnerships assume diverse roles in
SDG implementation. They harness expertise and resources from international
organizations, NGOs, governments, and the private sector, striving for faster,
more effective, and equitable SDG achievement. Partnership forms include local
implementation, resource mobilization, advocacy, policy development, lobbying,
and market-based operations (IRENA, 2023). Partnerships are fundamental for
catalyzing Sustainable Energy investment. The global sustainable development
landscape's divergence necessitates immediate action to bridge the finance gap.
Recent global crises expedite calls for reform in the international financial
structure, urging rapid institutional change. Seizing this opportunity
necessitates concerted efforts, emphasizing increased development cooperation,
SDG investments, and fortified global financial architecture (DESA, 2023). This
chapter explores the Global Landscapes of Partnership and Financing for
Sustainable Energy and SDGs interlinkages, offering strategies to leverage new
collaborations and scale-up financing 1)       Partnership Ecosystems for
Sustainable Energy and Integrated SDGs UN-Energy, established by the UN System
Chief Executives Board, is the United Nations’ mechanism for inter-agency
collaboration on energy issues, aligning efforts to meet SDG 7 and support the
2030 Agenda and Paris Agreement. With 30 leading organizations globally and
involvement in over 190 countries, it aims to promote coordinated policy
development, implementation, and knowledge sharing (Figure 10). Figure 10: UN-
Energy members and partners A Global Roadmap for SDG 7 Action was developed
following the UN Secretary-General's Dialogue on Energy, prioritizing energy
access, decarbonization, finance, inclusivity, and innovation. This Roadmap will
be achieved through over 200 Energy Compacts, translating commitments into
concrete actions and partnerships. UN-Energy pledges to accelerate action
through collaborative efforts, expanded partnerships, global campaigns, greener
operations, forums, and tracking progress. Leveraging multi-stakeholder
coalitions and bolstered capacity, UN-Energy aims to harness energy's potential
for global sustainable development. The Energy Compact Action Network by UN-
Energy bolsters momentum, welcomes new stakeholders, fosters coalition-building,
and drives continuous ambition and action, catalyzing necessary finance and
investment. UN-Energy supports collective scaling through joint programs,
amplifying UN collaboration, and Member State engagement. These programs focus
on bridging the energy access gap, ensuring inclusive transitions, and
integrating energy across sectors to achieve the SDGs. The urgent need for
integrated approaches optimizing energy's impact on various sectors, ensuring
equity in global energy transformation, and prioritizing gender inclusion calls
for immediate action. Strengthening inter-agency cooperation and leveraging data
and digitalization for monitoring and communication of results remain central to
their approach. Tracking progress through dynamic online platforms and
indicators developed by advisory bodies ensures transparent and accountable
reporting toward the milestones outlined in the Global Roadmap for SDGs. UN-
Energy will compile a dynamic overview towards the milestones of the Global
Roadmap, building on existing tools for tracking and monitoring, including
Tracking SDG 7: The Energy Progress Report, the work of the SDG7 Technical
Advisory Group (SDG7-TAG) and other relevant efforts. This will include
establishing a dynamic online platform through which it will regularly provide
updates on progress and activities undertaken. For instance, the SDG7-TAG
advisory body developed a set of indicators for addressing Energy’s
Interlinkages (SDGs UN, 2022). SDG 7 Technical Advisory Group (SDG7-TAG): The
SDG7-TAG stands as a multi-stakeholder coalition encompassing governments, UN
agencies, civil society, the private sector, and diverse stakeholders, operating
under the UN Department of Economic and Social Affairs. This group essentially
serves as a collaborative body advising on strategies, analyses, and actions to
accelerate progress towards achieving SDG7 and its interconnected goals. Through
inclusive processes, policy briefs, and strategic recommendations, the SDG7-TAG
aims to enhance the High-Level Political Forum's effectiveness, fostering
partnerships and actions, providing analytical insights, overseeing the annual
SDG7 Energy Tracking report, and advising on coordination efforts. SDG 7
Technical Advisory Group (SDG7-TAG): The SDG7-TAG stands as a multi-stakeholder
coalition encompassing governments, UN agencies, civil society, the private
sector, and diverse stakeholders, operating under the UN Department of Economic
and Social Affairs. This group essentially serves as a collaborative body
advising on strategies, analyses, and actions to accelerate progress towards
achieving SDG7 and its interconnected goals. Through inclusive processes, policy
briefs, and strategic recommendations, the SDG7-TAG aims to enhance the High-
Level Political Forum's effectiveness, fostering partnerships and actions,
providing analytical insights, overseeing the annual SDG7 Energy Tracking
report, and advising on coordination efforts. This section delves into the
global landscape of multi-stakeholder alliances and platforms. It begins by
introducing relevant compacts, coalitions, alliances, hubs, and public-private
partnerships. It then highlights significant joint programs and inter-agency
initiatives before concluding with key multi-stakeholder knowledge and data
platforms. 1)        Compacts, Coalitions, Alliances, Hubs and Public-Private
Partnerships Figure 11: Energy Compact Overview (UNDP, 2022) United Nations
Global Compact (UNGC): The United Nations Global Compact (UNGC) is a significant
initiative with over 9,500 companies and 3,000 non-business signatories across
160+ countries, spanning civil society, government bodies, investor groups,
academia, and 70 local networks. It fosters responsible business practices by
aligning strategies with ten core principles related to human rights, labor,
environment, and anti-corruption. This voluntary effort encourages businesses to
contribute to societal goals and the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs),
aiming to mobilize a global movement of responsible enterprises and drive
actions for a sustainable world. The UNGC emphasizes multi-sectoral
collaborations, transformative partnerships, and action platforms engaging
diverse stakeholders to address complex challenges and achieve SDGs through
scalable impacts and time-bound deliverables. Gender and Energy Compact: The
Gender and Energy Compact, led by ENERGIA, GWNET, and UNIDO, is a global
coalition focused on advancing gender equality and women's empowerment in the
context of a just, inclusive, and sustainable energy transition. Comprising
stakeholders from governments, private sector, academia, civil society, youth,
and international organizations, this coalition aims to achieve two core goals:
ensuring women have equal opportunities to lead, participate in, and benefit
from a sustainable energy transition, and granting women equal access to and
control over sustainable energy products and services. Through joint commitments
and individual Energy Compacts submitted by signatories, the Compact strives to
eliminate energy and time poverty, foster gender-responsive energy policies,
enhance women's entrepreneurship and career advancement, and promote gender-
responsive knowledge and data availability by 2030. These efforts target the
achievement of SDG7 on universal access to sustainable energy and SDG5 on gender
equality through tangible outcomes, including increased resources for women-led
businesses, improved employment opportunities, and more comprehensive data and
tools for gender-responsive policy formulation and evaluation. UNDP’s
Sustainable Energy Hub: The UNDP Sustainable Energy Hub collaborates with
governments, UN-Energy, member states, the private sector, and civil society to
facilitate a just and sustainable energy transition. Their aim is to support
countries in achieving SDG 7 by providing clean, affordable energy to an
additional 500 million people by 2025. The Sustainable Energy Hub aims to
mobilize partnerships to accelerate the low carbon transition and renewable
energy revolution. Powering Healthcare Hub: The Powering Healthcare Hub, driven
by SEforALL and in collaboration with other stakeholders, aims to resolve the
issue of inadequate or unreliable electricity access in healthcare facilities,
impacting around one billion people globally. This initiative offers a
centralized platform providing data, best practices, and leadership to
facilitate the electrification of health facilities. It addresses the estimated
requirement of USD 5 billion for electrifying health facilities in South Asia
and Sub-Saharan Africa, integrating innovative technologies and business models.
SEforALL's Powering Healthcare program underpins this initiative, empowering
governments and development partners with evidence and solutions to achieve
sustainable electrification of health facilities by 2030. The program aims to
inspire stronger commitments, increase investments, and enhance the
sustainability of interventions, contributing to universal, sustainable
electrification in the healthcare sector. Global Interventions Map: The Global
Interventions database provides a one-stop sectoral overview of the work
happening around the world to electrify healthcare facilities, and aids
stakeholders in identifying opportunities for coordination and collaboration.
Global Interventions Map: The Global Interventions database provides a one-stop
sectoral overview of the work happening around the world to electrify healthcare
facilities, and aids stakeholders in identifying opportunities for coordination
and collaboration. Global Alliance for Clean Cookstoves: The Global Alliance for
Clean Cookstoves, hosted by the UN Foundation, is a public-private partnership
uniting over 1300 partners from governments, multilateral organizations, the
private sector, NGOs, academia, and philanthropy. Established to create a
thriving market for clean household cooking solutions, its objectives include
saving lives, enhancing livelihoods, and preserving the environment, recognizing
particularly the impact on women due to traditional cooking methods. Focused on
promoting clean and efficient cooking (SDG7) and empowering women by reducing
their exposure to indoor air pollution (SDG5), the Alliance seeks to reach 100
million households by 2020. To achieve this, it concentrates on catalyzing the
sector, attracting investments, advocating for change, setting standards,
conducting research, and advocating globally. This partnership addresses global
needs, prioritizes market-based solutions, and coordinates a comprehensive
strategy for clean cooking solutions' widespread adoption, emphasizing
accessibility and sustainability. This alliance has developed an “Introductory
Framework for Measurement, Reporting, and Verification for Clean Cooking Energy
Initiatives” (links) Global Platform for Action (GPA) on Sustainable Energy in
Displacement Settings: The Global Platform for Action (GPA) on Sustainable
Energy in Displacement Settings operates as a united effort hosted by UNITAR to
ensure sustainable energy access in humanitarian contexts. It collaborates with
energy, development, and humanitarian partners to transition towards renewable
energy, aiming to improve efficiency, reduce costs, and cut emissions. GPA
focuses on local solutions, gender sensitivity, and financial sustainability
across five thematic areas. Engaging displaced persons, host communities,
governments, and humanitarian agencies, it aims to devise context-specific
solutions for collective change in energy access for crisis-affected
communities. The GPA is guided by a coalition of UN and international bodies,
including UNITAR, UNHCR, IOM, GIZ, WFP, FAO, UNEP, UNDP, Chatham House,
Practical Action, Clean Cooking Alliance, Mercy Corps, Sustainable Energy for
All, SNV, Lifeline Fund, and MECS and receives support from the Federal Foreign
Office of Germany, Norway, NORCAP, and MECS. Partnership for Action on Green
Economy (PAGE): PAGE, comprising five UN agencies (UNEP, ILO, UNDP, UNIDO,
UNITAR), funding partners, and partner countries, focuses on transforming
economies into drivers of sustainability. Since 2013, it embeds lasting changes
in national policies, providing integrated support to reduce poverty, enhance
social equity, and promote environmental stewardship while sustaining economic
growth. With a vision challenging current economic trajectories, it aims to
achieve global sustainability goals by reframing economic policies, fostering
collaborations, and informing policy debates. The partnership's activities
involve supporting countries at different policy development stages, managing
substantial funding, engaging UN agencies for expertise, and collaborating with
various action partners for effective outcomes. Better Than Cash Alliance: The
Better Than Cash Alliance, housed within the United Nations, comprises
governments, corporations, and global entities committed to expediting the
transition from cash to responsible digital payments to drive the Sustainable
Development Goals. With 80 members, including national governments from Africa,
Asia-Pacific, and Latin America, as well as global brands and humanitarian NGOs,
the alliance advocates for digitizing payments to enhance efficiency,
transparency, and women's economic participation. By providing advisory
services, sharing research, and fostering peer learning, it aims to ensure that
digital payment options surpass cash in terms of responsibility, inclusivity,
and efficiency, acknowledging the importance of cash while advocating for secure
and empowering digital alternatives. UN Office for Partnership: The United
Nations Office for Partnerships (UN Partnerships) operates as a global hub for
fostering partnerships to drive SDGs. Through the Executive Director's office,
SDG Advocates, Strategy Hub, climate action mobilization, UNDEF, and UNFIP, it
engages stakeholders globally, enhancing coordination and accountability towards
achieving SDGs. The Advocates leverage their influential positions to drive
transformative change, while the Strategy Hub collaborates across sectors for
SDG activations. Climate action mobilization focuses on ambitious climate goals,
while UNDEF and UNFIP empower civil society and facilitate cross-sector
initiatives, respectively, contributing to a comprehensive approach for
sustainable development. 2) Joint Programs and Inter-agencies Initiatives The
Giga initiative: Giga aims to connect every school globally by 2030, leveraging
UNICEF’s educational expertise, ITU’s regulatory knowledge, and private sector
tech solutions. It maps schools and connectivity levels, utilizing machine
learning for real-time mapping, aiding funders, governments, and ensuring
accountability. This initiative stands out in the UN Secretary-General’s Digital
Cooperation Roadmap and Common Agenda, emphasizing its significance. Mapping
schools allows effective resource allocation, guides emergency response efforts
and ensures quality internet access, addressing data inequity and highlighting
infrastructure gaps for better investment opportunities. Giga ultimately aims to
establish market demand, encouraging internet service providers to expand
infrastructure to remote areas, reducing disparities and fostering global
connectivity. United for Efficiency: The United for Efficiency (U4E) initiative,
under the leadership of the United Nations Environment Programme (UNEP),
spearheads a global effort focused on aiding developing nations and emerging
economies in transitioning towards energy-efficient appliances and equipment.
U4E operates through a multi-stakeholder approach, collaborating with diverse
partners, including UNEP, the Global Environment Facility (GEF), UNDP, industry
leaders like the International Copper Association (ICA), CLASP, and NRDC. This
initiative's primary objectives involve informing policymakers about the
benefits of high-efficiency products, promoting best practices, offering
tailored assistance to governments in developing and implementing strategies,
and extending its scope beyond efficient lighting to encompass various high-
efficiency products. U4E's core emphasis lies in reducing global electricity
demand, mitigating climate change, and enhancing quality of life by optimizing
energy usage. Its comprehensive approach addresses electricity wastage,
pollution, and greenhouse gases, offering financial grants, policy guides,
national market transformation projects, and capacity-building workshops across
various regions, engaging over 60 partners globally. Academic institutions,
industry leaders, and international organizations are part of this collaborative
effort, supporting countries in their transition to sustainable, energy-
efficient products to yield significant economic and environmental benefits. 3)
Multi-Stakeholders Knowledge and Data Platforms Global Partnership for
Sustainable Development Data (GPSDD): The Global Partnership for Sustainable
Development Data is a vast network comprising over 700 organizations spanning
private sectors, academia, civil society, and governments worldwide. Operating
across 35+ countries with a network in 80+, its primary focus is leveraging the
transformative potential of data to drive change aligned with the Sustainable
Development Goals (SDGs). By advocating for inclusive, timely, and well-governed
data, the partnership aims to empower governments to make informed decisions and
policies. Their strategic approach involves boosting data use through multi-
stakeholder collaborations, addressing challenges like limited data access and
analytical capacity. Their goal is to ensure marginalized groups have
representation in data processes while promoting accountable data governance as
a standard practice, all with the ultimate aim of accelerating SDG progress and
fostering impactful global change. UN Sustainable Development Group: The UN
Sustainable Development Group (UNSDG) operates globally as a critical forum
driving joint policies, decisions, and investments in line with the 2030 Agenda
for Sustainable Development and its 17 goals. Covering 162 countries and
territories, this body oversees and coordinates UN efforts worldwide for
sustainable development. It translates global decisions into actionable
initiatives at the country level, as showcased through the UNSDG Data portal
(UNINFO). Furthermore, at the regional level, the five Regional Collaborative
Platforms (RCP) unify all UN entities, chaired by the Deputy Secretary-General
and co-chaired by key representatives from Regional Economic Commissions and the
United Nations Development Programme (UNDP). These RCPs concentrate on cross-
border challenges, pooling expertise to cater to the specific needs of each
region while reinforcing coordination between UN entities and supporting
country-level work conducted by Resident Coordinators and UN country teams. For
instance, the UNESCAP and the Asia-Pacific UN Development Coordination Office,
have led in consultation with the UNSDG the Asia-Pacific Knowledge Management
Hub. UNINFO, UNSDG Data Portal: Managed by the UN Development Coordination
Office (DCO), the portal showcases country-level UN programming, including new
Sustainable Development Cooperation Frameworks and previous UN Development
Assistance Frameworks. Users can access country-specific summaries and
comprehensive information about the UN Country Team's work via filters and menu
options. Overseeing sustainable development across 162 countries, UNSDG's data
portal, UNINFO, offers valuable insights into translating global decisions into
actionable progress at the country level. UNINFO, UNSDG Data Portal: Managed by
the UN Development Coordination Office (DCO), the portal showcases country-level
UN programming, including new Sustainable Development Cooperation Frameworks and
previous UN Development Assistance Frameworks. Users can access country-specific
summaries and comprehensive information about the UN Country Team's work via
filters and menu options. Overseeing sustainable development across 162
countries, UNSDG's data portal, UNINFO, offers valuable insights into
translating global decisions into actionable progress at the country level.
Asia-Pacific Knowledge Management Hub: The Asia-Pacific Knowledge Management
Hub, spearheaded by UNESCAP and the Asia-Pacific UN Development Coordination
Office, stands as a centralized platform aggregating policy expertise across
sectors. This initiative aims to streamline access to knowledge resources, SDG-
related data, tools, and educational materials, facilitating countries and
country teams in identifying and responding to emerging national needs aligned
with the 2030 Agenda. Functioning in close coordination with the regional UN
Sustainable Development Group, the Hub acts as a repository for SDG-related
information, offering a gateway to regional statistical data, while also
providing access to a network of expertise and practitioners dedicated to
supporting the effective implementation of sustainable development initiatives.
Asia-Pacific Knowledge Management Hub: The Asia-Pacific Knowledge Management
Hub, spearheaded by UNESCAP and the Asia-Pacific UN Development Coordination
Office, stands as a centralized platform aggregating policy expertise across
sectors. This initiative aims to streamline access to knowledge resources, SDG-
related data, tools, and educational materials, facilitating countries and
country teams in identifying and responding to emerging national needs aligned
with the 2030 Agenda. Functioning in close coordination with the regional UN
Sustainable Development Group, the Hub acts as a repository for SDG-related
information, offering a gateway to regional statistical data, while also
providing access to a network of expertise and practitioners dedicated to
supporting the effective implementation of sustainable development initiatives.
UN Sustainable Development Solutions Network (SDSN): The UN Sustainable
Development Solutions Network (SDSN), established in 2012, operates under the UN
Secretary-General to engage universities, think tanks, and laboratories in
advancing the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs) and Paris Agreement
objectives. This network mobilizes academia, civil society, UN agencies, and the
private sector to translate scientific evidence into actionable solutions for
sustainable development. As of 2023, the SDSN has over 1,800 members in 50+
networks across more than 145 countries. It serves as an educational and
research alliance, facilitating global cooperation, producing vital research
reports such as the <a href="https://www.sdgindex.org/">Sustainable Development
Report</a>. SDSN's vision involves empowering societies through free online
education (SDG Academy) and aims to accelerate SDG progress through academic
expertise, research contributions, policy analysis, and global collaboration.
The SDSN Climate & Energy Program is advancing technological developments and
innovative practices to achieve energy systems decarbonization. SDSN Climate &
Energy Program: The purpose of the SDSN Climate & Energy Program is to bolster
the capacity of UNFCCC signatory nations in formulating and executing long-term
low greenhouse gas emissions strategies (NDCs and LEDSs) as stipulated by the
Paris Agreement. It aims to develop 2050 strategies for decarbonized energy
systems through public-private collaborations, foster a global dialogue among
engineers and tech experts for innovative carbon-neutral solutions, and
facilitate international partnerships for technological solutions involving
governments, businesses, academia, and civil society. This program seeks to
empower nations in achieving the goals outlined in the Paris Agreement by
enhancing technical capabilities, encouraging innovation, and promoting
collaborative efforts across various sectors. SDSN Climate & Energy Program: The
purpose of the SDSN Climate & Energy Program is to bolster the capacity of
UNFCCC signatory nations in formulating and executing long-term low greenhouse
gas emissions strategies (NDCs and LEDSs) as stipulated by the Paris Agreement.
It aims to develop 2050 strategies for decarbonized energy systems through
public-private collaborations, foster a global dialogue among engineers and tech
experts for innovative carbon-neutral solutions, and facilitate international
partnerships for technological solutions involving governments, businesses,
academia, and civil society. This program seeks to empower nations in achieving
the goals outlined in the Paris Agreement by enhancing technical capabilities,
encouraging innovation, and promoting collaborative efforts across various
sectors. 2)      Establishing Effective Partnerships and Collaboration This
section delves into two essential strategies for fostering partnership and
collaboration. Initially, it provides insights into constructing and efficiently
managing multi-stakeholder partnerships aimed at addressing various SDGs.
Following this, it examines methodological considerations for developing Joint
Programs in a multi-stakeholder environment. UN leaders from UNDP, UNFPA, UNIDO,
and UN Women have emphasized the imperative need for rapid scaling up of cross-
sector partnerships to expedite progress on the Sustainable Development Goals
(Accenture, 2018). 1)     Building and Managing Effective Multi-Stakeholder
Partnerships for SDG Progress The 2030 Agenda Partnership Accelerator, led by UN
DESA and The Partnering Initiative, in collaboration with UNOP, UN Global
Compact, and UN Development Coordination Office, aims to expedite multi-
stakeholder partnerships for the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs). It offers
training, advisory services, and capacity building to member States, UN
entities, and country teams to strengthen collaboration across sectors, foster
new partnerships, and establish effective platforms at the national level. Its
objectives include establishing partnerships, enhancing skills for SDG-focused
collaborations, and promoting collaboration between diverse stakeholders to
boost engagement and implementation of the SDGs. The Partnership Accelerator
offers a network of individuals committed to building effective multi-
stakeholder partnerships for the Sustainable Development Goals (Accelerators)
and a Partnership Learning Centre including modules on how to build and manage
effective multi-stakeholder partnerships to advance the SDGs. Building and
managing effective multi-stakeholder partnerships to advance the SDGs requires
the following steps: --        Creating Collaboration Space: Establish an
environment conducive to collaboration, integrating policies, catalytic
platforms, high partnership standards, institutionally adept organizations, and
skilled individuals for fruitful partnerships. --    Partnerships for SDGs:
Embrace the 2030 Agenda, emphasizing the need for significant changes in
international development, fostering systematic collaboration among sectors, and
elevating partnerships as pivotal for SDG-aligned progress. -- Private Sector
Engagement: Understand the private sector's role, incentives, potential
conflicts of interest, and its alignment with development goals. --
Defining Partnerships: Clarify the spectrum of partnerships for the SDGs,
strategic planning, and categorization. --    Understanding Stakeholders: Adopt
a creative thinking approach in identifying stakeholders and resources. --
Maximizing Partnership Value: Ensure every partnership generates net value for
each partner through the Collaborative Advantage and maximize partnership value
through negotiation. --  Partnership Lifecycle: Understand the different stages
of partnerships from initiation to conclusion. --        Effective Partnership
Building Blocks: Focus on fundamentals, partnership relationships, structuring,
and management as the key building blocks for successful partnerships. --
Institutional Readiness: Overcome internal obstacles within organizations,
addressing strategic, systemic, capacity, and cultural challenges to amplify
partnership ambitions. Figure 12. The Partnership Life Cycle and the Partnership
Journey to Action (DESA & TPI) 2)      Developing Joint Programs The Guidance
Note on a New Generation of Joint Programs, developed by the The United Nations
Sustainable Development Group (UNSDG), is intended to make joint programs (JP)
more effective, catalytic, and easier to use. It responds to guidance and
decisions by members states, lessons from experience, and needs identified by UN
Country Teams. The guidance aims to enhance Joint Programs (JPs) within the
Cooperation Framework, emphasizing key aspects like catalyzing policy changes,
government ownership, aligned roles and responsibilities, quality standards, and
joint management for results. It introduces options for flexible JP design and
non-UN partner involvement, aiming to improve effectiveness and attract
increased donor investment in support of the SDGs across all UN funds, programs,
and specialized agencies. United Nations Sustainable Development Cooperation
Framework: The 2030 Agenda emphasizes a responsive UN development system,
encapsulated in the new Internal Guidance for the UN Sustainable Development
Cooperation Framework. These frameworks focus on four key objectives: aligning
responses to national priorities for SDG achievement, fostering diverse
partnerships across sectors and stakeholders, ensuring no one is left behind,
and tailoring approaches to each Member State's needs. The Cooperation Framework
now guides the entire program cycle, driving planning, implementation,
monitoring, reporting and evaluation of collective UN support for achieving the
2030 Agenda. By emphasizing inclusivity, partnerships, and tailored responses,
these frameworks aim to drive concrete actions on the ground, leveraging the UN
system's collective capabilities to realize the 2030 Agenda globally. United
Nations Sustainable Development Cooperation Framework: The 2030 Agenda
emphasizes a responsive UN development system, encapsulated in the new Internal
Guidance for the UN Sustainable Development Cooperation Framework. These
frameworks focus on four key objectives: aligning responses to national
priorities for SDG achievement, fostering diverse partnerships across sectors
and stakeholders, ensuring no one is left behind, and tailoring approaches to
each Member State's needs. The Cooperation Framework now guides the entire
program cycle, driving planning, implementation, monitoring, reporting and
evaluation of collective UN support for achieving the 2030 Agenda. By
emphasizing inclusivity, partnerships, and tailored responses, these frameworks
aim to drive concrete actions on the ground, leveraging the UN system's
collective capabilities to realize the 2030 Agenda globally. A joint program is
a strategic collaboration between two or more UN organizations and partners
aimed at achieving significant development outcomes. It leverages the strengths
of participating entities to deliver results aligned with country priorities,
Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs), and Cooperation Framework objectives.
These programs focus on policy changes that can drive systemic impact and may
operate at country, regional, or global levels, involving multiple regions or
countries. To implement a JP, key steps involve verifying its suitability,
defining responsibilities across the JP cycle stages (Design, Implement &
Adjust, Learn, Transition, and Close), and ensuring adherence to standard
program cycles and quality standards aligned with the Cooperation Framework.
Figure 13. Joint Program Cycle (UNSDG, 2022) To understand this cycle within a
specific sector, a practical example to be considered is the UN-Habitat Guidance
for Multi-Partner Initiatives from the Global Future Cities Program. Example:
Partnering for Transformative SDG-Oriented Urban Development, Guidance for
Multi-Partner Initiatives from the Global Future Cities Program, UN-Habitat
Based on experiences from the Global Future Cities Program (GFCP), this report
provides guidance to international donors, city authorities, UN agencies, and
delivery partners about how to design and run multi-partner urban development
initiatives that drive transformative impact and accelerate SDG implementation
in rapidly urbanizing cities. Example: Partnering for Transformative SDG-
Oriented Urban Development, Guidance for Multi-Partner Initiatives from the
Global Future Cities Program, UN-Habitat Based on experiences from the Global
Future Cities Program (GFCP), this report provides guidance to international
donors, city authorities, UN agencies, and delivery partners about how to design
and run multi-partner urban development initiatives that drive transformative
impact and accelerate SDG implementation in rapidly urbanizing cities. 3)
Financial Mechanism for Integrated SDGs Achievement Optimized financing has the
potential to unlock substantial savings. Initiatives such as the Africa
Minigrids Program showcase the potential of kickstarting large-scale private
investments by developing early-stage minigrid markets. This section explores
financial mechanisms for achieving integrated SDGs. It begins by examining the
evolving financial landscape within the new investment paradigm, discussing
shifts and trends influencing investment priorities. It then spotlights emerging
financial solutions and opportunities that can drive sustainable development
efforts. Additionally, it explores diverse financing frameworks, platforms, and
tools available to support the realization of SDGs. SDG Finance in Energy: The
Africa Minigrids Program (AMP) The Africa Minigrids Program (AMP) operates in 21
African countries, focusing on early-stage minigrid markets to enable subsequent
large-scale private investments. AMP aims to enhance clean energy access by
boosting the financial viability of renewable energy minigrids, emphasizing cost
reduction (hardware, soft, and financing costs) and innovative business models.
These efforts intend to lower tariffs and expand services for end-users. This
multi-partner initiative involves UNDP, the Rocky Mountain Institute, and the
African Development Bank, funded by GEF. Collaborating with various
stakeholders, AMP supplements existing efforts in the minigrid space, fostering
partnerships and cooperation. Launched in 2022, AMP is scheduled to run until
2027. SDG Finance in Energy: The Africa Minigrids Program (AMP) The Africa
Minigrids Program (AMP) operates in 21 African countries, focusing on early-
stage minigrid markets to enable subsequent large-scale private investments. AMP
aims to enhance clean energy access by boosting the financial viability of
renewable energy minigrids, emphasizing cost reduction (hardware, soft, and
financing costs) and innovative business models. These efforts intend to lower
tariffs and expand services for end-users. This multi-partner initiative
involves UNDP, the Rocky Mountain Institute, and the African Development Bank,
funded by GEF. Collaborating with various stakeholders, AMP supplements existing
efforts in the minigrid space, fostering partnerships and cooperation. Launched
in 2022, AMP is scheduled to run until 2027. 1)  The Collaborative Financial
Landscape Joint SDG Fund: The Joint SDG Fund operates as a multi-partner trust
fund supporting broader UN functions in a flexible and multilateral-friendly
manner. It aims to mobilize $290 million annually for SDG-focused development
programs, having funded 230 joint initiatives across 119 countries and
territories. With partners including UN Member States, international
organizations, the private sector, and philanthropists, it has generated over
1,000 partnerships and tested 300+ innovative solutions for the 2030 Agenda. In
2022, it finalized 35 integrated programs, attracted $2.3 billion in additional
financing alongside its $258 million commitments, achieving a leverage of over
$9 for every $1, fostering an environment for SDG-driven policies. This effort
prioritizes two outcomes: Accelerating SDG Achievement Through Integrated
Policies and Amplifying Finance for Transformative Change. A thematic focus on
Climate Action and Energy Transformation, engaging with UNFCCC and stakeholders,
emphasized the implementation of climate programs, amounting to $83 million in
commitments, positioning the Fund as a COP financing solution. Global Impact
Investing Network (GIIN): The Global Impact Investing Network (GIIN) serves as a
global advocate for impact investing, striving to enhance its global
effectiveness. Through collaboration with investors, the GIIN facilitates
knowledge exchange, promotes innovation, and provides resources to reduce
barriers to impact investment, directing more capital toward global challenges.
Its strategy includes networking, alliances, events, impact measurement tools,
research initiatives, and market leadership programs. Engaging with strategic
partners like the Asian Venture Philanthropy Network, the GIIN aims to build an
ecosystem that fosters impactful investing, contributing to a more equitable and
sustainable world. Partnership Fund for the Sustainable Development Goals: The
Partnership Fund for the Sustainable Development Goals, led by the World Bank
Group, aligns with SDG 17 to bolster global partnerships for sustainable
development. Established in 2018, it channels seed funding to strategic, high-
impact initiatives aimed at fostering an enabling environment for investment,
innovation, and scalable solutions. With three core objectives—strengthening
capacity for SDG implementation, developing analytical tools, and fostering
multi-stakeholder partnerships—the Fund collaborates with over 400 partners,
including UN agencies, private entities, academia, and civil society. The
Partnership Fund for SDG has supported the implementation of Panama’s Energy
Transition Agenda by assisting the Government of Panama with the preliminary
design of the Energy Transition Fund (FTE) and the preparation of a WB guarantee
operation to help capitalize the fund. Design Support for the Energy Transition
Fund in Panama: Led by Panama's National Secretariat of Energy (SNE), the FTE
will drive action plans for the country's energy transition. Additionally, this
initiative fosters international experience in fund design and capacity-building
in SNE, with plans for replication in Central America, including Costa Rica, El
Salvador, and the Dominican Republic. Notably, the FTE will focus on solar
systems for subsidized households and credit lines for solar systems and
efficient equipment in non-subsidized homes, enabling preferential loans for
installing solar panels and energy-efficient appliances. Design Support for the
Energy Transition Fund in Panama: Led by Panama's National Secretariat of Energy
(SNE), the FTE will drive action plans for the country's energy transition.
Additionally, this initiative fosters international experience in fund design
and capacity-building in SNE, with plans for replication in Central America,
including Costa Rica, El Salvador, and the Dominican Republic. Notably, the FTE
will focus on solar systems for subsidized households and credit lines for solar
systems and efficient equipment in non-subsidized homes, enabling preferential
loans for installing solar panels and energy-efficient appliances. UN Capital
Development Fund (UNCDF): The UN Capital Development Fund (UNCDF), created by
the UN General Assembly, aids developing nations by offering grants and loans.
Focused on Least Developed Countries (LDCs), it operates autonomously under the
UN Development Programme and collaborates with member states and partners. UNCDF
targets sustainable growth aligned with global agendas, emphasizing
partnerships, inclusive finance, and leveraging public-private resources. Its
main aim is to assist LDCs facing crises and challenges like COVID-19 and
climate change, deploying capital strategically across key areas for
transformative economic growth from 2022-2025. Inter-agency Task Force on
Financing for Development (IATF): The Inter-Agency Task Force on Financing for
Development, comprising over 60 UN agencies, coordinates efforts to implement
the Addis Ababa Action Agenda. Led by Mr. Li Junhua, it advises on sustainable
development financing, providing annual reports to ECOSOC. Its mandate includes
analyzing global contexts, highlighting synergies within the Addis Agenda, and
addressing thematic issues, aiming to guide progress and recommend corrective
actions at national and regional levels. This information is synthetized into
Financing for Sustainable Development Report. This collaboration among
international institutions ensures effective follow-up on financing for
sustainable development. 2)       Emerging Financial Solutions and Opportunities
Various innovative financing solutions are emerging to address specific
development challenges. (UNDP, 2018) (G20, 2022) Scaling up blended finance and
de-risking facilities: Blended finance, including de-risking facilities,
creatively combines public, private, and philanthropic funds to tackle
development challenges. It leverages public resources to attract private
investment, maximizing impact. By mitigating risk for private investors, it
encourages their involvement in projects that might not have been feasible
otherwise. This approach aligns diverse interests and capitalizes on the
strengths of various sectors to achieve sustainable development goals. Blending
practices vary across institutions, including the use of concessional and non-
concessional public finance from MDBs, other Development Finance Institutions
(DFIs) and development aid programs, and to a lesser extent, donors and other
third parties. A key benefit of blended finance mechanisms, as opposed to purely
public finance, is that it crowds in private capital and can expand the total
amount of sustainable finance available and thereby improve the affordability
and accessibility of sustainable finance. It can also operate as a mechanism to
create sustainable markets by being the initial finance that allows a market or
sector to develop. Developing and deploying digital technologies: The
utilization of digital technologies presents a transformative opportunity in
sustainable finance and inclusive development. These technologies significantly
reduce the expenses related to data collection, assessment, and reporting,
enabling the identification of sustainable assets and the disclosure of crucial
ESG information. However, challenges persist, especially for sectors like
agriculture and tourism in developing economies, where data collection remains
costly. Emerging technologies hold promise in easing this burden, particularly
for SMEs, potentially granting them easier access to sustainable finance.
Additionally, financial technologies like mobile payment systems have notably
expanded financial services, particularly benefiting rural populations globally.
Recently, digital tools have been instrumental in gathering granular ESG data,
implementing Sustainable Supply Chain Financing (including Fintech tools such as
digital platforms and blockchain-based technologies), and managing sustainable
assets. Impact Investing: Impact investing aligns financial goals with social
and environmental impact. Investors actively seek opportunities that generate
positive, measurable outcomes alongside financial returns. This approach drives
capital towards businesses and projects that address pressing social and
environmental challenges, ensuring a more sustainable and equitable future.
Impact investing is a burgeoning solution, combining social and environmental
impact with financial returns globally. Key aspects involve intentional positive
impact, expected financial returns, and diverse return rates across various
assets. Robust impact measurement is pivotal for transparency. It offers
opportunities for investors to support societal causes while gaining financial
returns. Various entities, from financial institutions to governments, leverage
it for diverse reasons, attracting a broad spectrum of investors. Financial
performance varies, with some seeking below-market returns aligned with goals,
while others aim for competitive, market-rate returns. A handful of impact
investors have begun to create products, raise capital, and make new investments
that directly target progress toward the SDGs. Going beyond aligning and
retroactively mapping impact to the SDGs, these investors proactively target and
incorporate the goals at various stages of the investment cycle, thus making
them the central focus. Figure 14. SDG integration throughout the investment
cycle (GIIN, 2018) Partners Group PG Life Strategy: Partners Group introduced PG
LIFE to meet client demands for investments in line with UN SDGs, focusing on
healthcare, education, and clean energy. Operating across private markets for
pension and sovereign wealth funds, it uses an Impact Committee and an external
LIFE Council to ensure SDG alignment. The strategy integrates SDGs at every
investment stage, from sourcing to management, emphasizing impact metrics post-
investment. An investment example, Techem, offers heat and water sub-metering
services, reducing utility costs in Europe, UAE, Turkey, and Brazil, aligning
with SDG 6 and 7 by enhancing energy and water efficiency, also leading to
substantial CO2 emission reductions. Partners Group PG Life Strategy: Partners
Group introduced PG LIFE to meet client demands for investments in line with UN
SDGs, focusing on healthcare, education, and clean energy. Operating across
private markets for pension and sovereign wealth funds, it uses an Impact
Committee and an external LIFE Council to ensure SDG alignment. The strategy
integrates SDGs at every investment stage, from sourcing to management,
emphasizing impact metrics post-investment. An investment example, Techem,
offers heat and water sub-metering services, reducing utility costs in Europe,
UAE, Turkey, and Brazil, aligning with SDG 6 and 7 by enhancing energy and water
efficiency, also leading to substantial CO2 emission reductions. Budgeting for
SDGs (B4SDG): Budgeting for Sustainable Development Goals (B4SDG) involves
integrating SDGs into public finance and fiscal planning, championed by UNDP. It
supports strategic budgeting, enabling SDG integration into frameworks,
classification systems, and fostering public engagement for accountability. This
process aligns with countries’ efforts to meet the 2030 Agenda, incorporating 17
universal SDGs with 169 targets. B4SDG facilitates the translation of high-level
policies into budget decisions, enhancing efficiency, equity, and effectiveness
in achieving SDGs. The steps entail contextual analysis, reviewing the public
financial management system, assessing institutions, modeling the most relevant
tools for reforms, and formulating reform offers. Through these efforts, B4SDG
aims to bridge policy and budget systems, ensuring coherence, transparency, and
accountability, essential for SDG implementation. This initiative caters to UN
agencies and national governments, aiding in SDG mainstreaming, planning, and
budgeting processes, contributing significantly to the Integrated National
Financing Frameworks (INFFs). 3)     Financing Frameworks, Platforms and Tools
UNDP Sustainable Finance Hub (SFH): The Sustainable Finance Hub (SFH),
spearheaded by the United Nations Development Programme (UNDP), is a strategic
initiative aimed at catalyzing finance for the SDGs. The SFH engages
governments, civil society, and the private sector to prioritize SDG-aligned
investments. This initiative facilitates access to private investors, designs
innovative financial instruments, supports national financing frameworks, and
fosters knowledge sharing on sustainable finance practices. Collaborations span
UNDP Country Offices, the Istanbul International Center for Private Sector in
Development (IICPSD), international financial institutions, business leaders,
faith-based finance partners, and UN agencies like UNDESA, UNICEF, UN Women, and
UNCDF. The overarching goal is to establish an inclusive economic governance
architecture that mobilizes substantial resources towards the $1 trillion
‘Moonshot’ target for the SDGs, driving systemic reforms and enhancing alignment
and capacity for sustainable finance. The UNDP's Sustainable Finance Service
offers a 4+1 solution including: Public Finance, Unlocking Private Capital for
SDG alignment, SDG Impact Management & Finance Tracking, Integrated National
Financing Frameworks (INFFs) & Portfolios, and the SDG Finance Academy. UNDP’s
SDG Finance Academy: The SDG Finance Academy, launched by the Sustainable
Finance Hub, aims to achieve the $1 trillion SDG target. This Academy offers
comprehensive training across four core areas: Public Finance, Private Capital
Alignment, SDG Impact Management, and National Financing Frameworks. Tailored
for UNDP staff in 170 countries and external stakeholders, it provides knowledge
on financial tools, their alignment with SDGs, implications for policy reform,
and customization for national development needs. The Academy operates through
learning sessions, community building, expert curation, and engagement
facilitation and offers customizable training for public and private sectors,
emphasizing the interconnectedness of SDG finance principles. Parte superior do
formulário UNDP’s SDG Finance Academy: The SDG Finance Academy, launched by the
Sustainable Finance Hub, aims to achieve the $1 trillion SDG target. This
Academy offers comprehensive training across four core areas: Public Finance,
Private Capital Alignment, SDG Impact Management, and National Financing
Frameworks. Tailored for UNDP staff in 170 countries and external stakeholders,
it provides knowledge on financial tools, their alignment with SDGs,
implications for policy reform, and customization for national development
needs. The Academy operates through learning sessions, community building,
expert curation, and engagement facilitation and offers customizable training
for public and private sectors, emphasizing the interconnectedness of SDG
finance principles. Parte superior do formulário SDG Investor Platform: The SDG
Investor Platform, led by the United Nations Development Programme (UNDP) in
partnership with the Global Investors for Sustainable Development (GISD)
Alliance, acts as a comprehensive resource offering crucial data and insights
for investors to direct capital towards Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs). By
employing a rigorous methodology rooted in extensive research and stakeholder
input, it identifies global investment opportunities aligned with SDGs.
Leveraging partnerships with specialized partners and UNDP Country Offices, the
platform provides localized investment and impact data, aiding comprehensive
understanding. Its goal is to empower investors with the necessary tools to
drive capital towards SDGs while assisting countries in securing vital post-
COVID-19 financing for advancement, ultimately benefiting both human well-being
and environmental sustainability. The platform integrates UNDP’s SDG investor
Map, a country-specific market intelligence tool that translates SDG needs and
policy priorities into actionable investment opportunity areas. SDG Investor
Map: The SDG Investor Maps are country-specific tools developed by the United
Nations Development Programme (UNDP) to bridge the gap between interest and
investment in Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs). These innovative maps employ
a rigorous eight-step methodology involving comprehensive desk research and
consultations with public and private sectors within countries. By identifying
overlaps between development needs and policy priorities, these maps validate
potential impactful and investable business models. The goal is to transform SDG
needs and policy priorities into actionable investment opportunities, directing
capital towards emerging markets where SDG priorities align with government
policies and market opportunities. SDG Investor Map: The SDG Investor Maps are
country-specific tools developed by the United Nations Development Programme
(UNDP) to bridge the gap between interest and investment in Sustainable
Development Goals (SDGs). These innovative maps employ a rigorous eight-step
methodology involving comprehensive desk research and consultations with public
and private sectors within countries. By identifying overlaps between
development needs and policy priorities, these maps validate potential impactful
and investable business models. The goal is to transform SDG needs and policy
priorities into actionable investment opportunities, directing capital towards
emerging markets where SDG priorities align with government policies and market
opportunities. Integrated National Financing Framework (INFF): The Integrated
National Financing Frameworks (INFFs) are a mechanism designed to finance
national sustainable development priorities and operationalize the Addis Ababa
Action Agenda at the country level. They serve as a planning and delivery tool,
bridging the gap between a country's sustainable development strategy and the
means to finance and implement it, utilizing diverse public and private
financing sources. INFFs aim to bolster planning processes, surmount obstacles,
and mobilize resources—both domestic and global—to support sustainable
development and the SDGs. These frameworks essentially guide the financing of
national strategies and prioritize the accomplishment of the 2030 Agenda and its
17 SDGs. INFFs operate via four essential building blocks: assessment and
diagnostics, financing strategy, monitoring and review, governance, and
coordination. These blocks collectively enhance a nation's ability to
strategically plan and manage sustainable development financing. Activities
within each block iteratively reinforce progress in others, leveraging existing
structures and mechanisms within national frameworks. While the core components
remain constant, actions within these blocks vary by country, culminating in an
INFF tailored to each nation's distinct capacities, vulnerabilities, and
priorities. INFF are fostering integrated financing solutions advancing toward
sustainable energy and other SDGs’ interlinkages in Tanzania and Azerbaijan.
Figure 15. The INFF building blocks (INFF website) Mobilizing private finance
through INFF: In Tanzania, INFFs are driving private investment by identifying
SDG-aligned opportunities across sectors like agriculture, education, and
renewable energy. Thirteen investment opportunity areas (IOAs) have been
pinpointed, attracting investments in solar solutions for community systems and
empowering rural women through edible oil crop farming. In Azerbaijan, the INFF
focuses on reducing fossil fuel dependence by steering investments toward green
energy and sustainable agriculture. The government aims to collaborate with the
private sector and global community to reshape policies, scale up SDG programs,
and transition to a green growth economy, mitigating inequalities and
environmental risks tied to the extractive industry. Mobilizing private finance
through INFF: In Tanzania, INFFs are driving private investment by identifying
SDG-aligned opportunities across sectors like agriculture, education, and
renewable energy. Thirteen investment opportunity areas (IOAs) have been
pinpointed, attracting investments in solar solutions for community systems and
empowering rural women through edible oil crop farming. In Azerbaijan, the INFF
focuses on reducing fossil fuel dependence by steering investments toward green
energy and sustainable agriculture. The government aims to collaborate with the
private sector and global community to reshape policies, scale up SDG programs,
and transition to a green growth economy, mitigating inequalities and
environmental risks tied to the extractive industry. Climate Investment
Platform: The Climate Investment Platform (CIP), led by IRENA in collaboration
with UNDP, SEforALL, and GCF, aims to bolster renewable energy impact investing
in developing nations. It offers tailored technical assistance and finance
matchmaking to advance renewable energy technologies. The platform invites
renewable energy projects aligned with SDGs and national climate priorities to
seek support beyond conceptual stages. CIP's Investment Forums, organized around
sub-regional clusters, focus on project pipeline development and dialogue
fostering improved investment conditions. These forums aim to enhance bankable
proposals, facilitate investment matchmaking, and encourage dialogue for better
investment frameworks. The platform's strategic approach includes continuous
support for projects attracting investor interest and capacity building for
policy enhancement and technical areas, aiming to fortify renewable energy
landscapes in developing countries. Development Finance Assessment (DFA) tool:
The Development Finance Assessment (DFA) tool, led by the United Nations
Development Programme (UNDP), serves as a multi-stakeholder mechanism addressing
the complex challenge of financing the Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs). It
aims to mobilize additional resources and optimize existing funds for
sustainable development. The DFA operates as a government-led process, engaging
various stakeholders from governments, private sectors, NGOs, and international
financial institutions. Its analytical framework evaluates and enhances
integrated planning and financing functions, fostering public-private
collaboration and accountability. Through this approach, the DFA aims to bridge
the gap between national planning and finance policies, fostering consensus-
driven solutions and creating roadmaps for achieving SDGs. UNDP’s comprehensive
guidebook supports countries in this endeavor, providing a structured approach
for officials, UNDP offices, and diverse stakeholders involved in the DFA
process, complemented by practical country examples to enhance SDG financing
integration. Figure 16. Development Finance Assessment process and roadmap The
Budget Intelligence Toolkit (BIT): The Budget Intelligence Toolkit (BIT) by the
United Nations Economic and Social Commission for Western Asia (UN ESCWA)
utilizes machine learning for fiscal incidence analysis on budget expenditures
and their impacts on the 17 SDGs and over 100 measurable indicators. It aims to
enhance public financial management across planning, spending, delivery, and
evaluation stages. By identifying budget allocations positively influencing SDG
progress, it aids policymakers in optimizing public spending. The BIT was
piloted in Egypt, revealing numerous direct and indirect links between
government expenditures and SDG performance, indicating the country's potential
for SDG progress through its spending patterns. This tool offers insights to
optimize spending efficiency, assess impacts, and align budgets effectively with
SDG objectives, partnering with ministries, central banks, and national
stakeholders. BIT outcomes in Egypt: In Egypt's fiscal year 2020, over a quarter
of the budget supported "people" and "prosperity," with significant allocations
to infrastructure, utilities, and economic growth. This allocation strategy
notably improved outcomes related to SDGs 3, 4, 6, 7, and 8, especially in
health, education, water, sanitation, energy, and economic growth. On average,
34% of government spending contributed to advancing social protection linked to
SDGs 1, 2, 3, 4, and 11. BIT outcomes in Egypt: In Egypt's fiscal year 2020,
over a quarter of the budget supported "people" and "prosperity," with
significant allocations to infrastructure, utilities, and economic growth. This
allocation strategy notably improved outcomes related to SDGs 3, 4, 6, 7, and 8,
especially in health, education, water, sanitation, energy, and economic growth.
On average, 34% of government spending contributed to advancing social
protection linked to SDGs 1, 2, 3, 4, and 11. Financing the 2030 Agenda,
Guidebook for UNDP Country Offices: UNDP developed the “An Introductory
Guidebook for UNDP Country Offices”. This guidebook provides an overview of
current and recent trends in financing for development and explores their
implications for the financing of the 2030 Agenda. Then UNDP’s approach for
providing country level support on financing for development is also presented.
Then is detailed UNDP’s current portfolio of work on financing for development,
and information on the tools and services provided, and where to source more
information. Finally, the guidebook describes some of the most widely-used
financial instruments as well as innovative finance mechanisms and looks at
their pros and cons (UNDP, 2018). Additional Resources: The Case for Long-Term
SDG Financing <a href="https://irp.cdn-website.com/be6d1d56/files/uploaded/the-
case-for-long-term-sdg-financing-e3a35f12.pdf">https://irp.cdn-
website.com/be6d1d56/files/uploaded/the-case-for-long-term-sdg-
financing-e3a35f12.pdf</a> SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT REPORT 2023 Implementing the
SDG Stimulus <a
href="https://s3.amazonaws.com/sustainabledevelopment.report/2023/sustainable-
development-report-
2023.pdf">https://s3.amazonaws.com/sustainabledevelopment.report/2023/sustainabl
e-development-report-2023.pdf</a> FACILITATING INVESTMENT IN THE SUSTAINABLE
DEVELOPMENT GOALS <a href="https://unctad.org/system/files/official-
document/diaepcb2022d3_en.pdf">https://unctad.org/system/files/official-
document/diaepcb2022d3_en.pdf</a> FINANCING THE SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT GOALS
THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF THE MULTILATERAL DEVELOPMENT BANKS <a href="https://www.un.
org/ohrlls/sites/www.un.org.ohrlls/files/mdb.pdf">https://www.un.org/ohrlls/site
s/www.un.org.ohrlls/files/mdb.pdf</a> SCALING FINANCE FOR THE SUSTAINABLE
DEVELOPMENT GOALS Foreign Direct Investment, Financial Intermediation and
Public-Private Partnerships <a
href="https://globalcompact.no/app/uploads/2020/01/Scaling-SDG-
Finance.pdf">https://globalcompact.no/app/uploads/2020/01/Scaling-SDG-
Finance.pdf</a> Additional Resources: The Case for Long-Term SDG Financing <a
href="https://irp.cdn-website.com/be6d1d56/files/uploaded/the-case-for-long-
term-sdg-financing-e3a35f12.pdf">https://irp.cdn-
website.com/be6d1d56/files/uploaded/the-case-for-long-term-sdg-
financing-e3a35f12.pdf</a> SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT REPORT 2023 Implementing the
SDG Stimulus <a
href="https://s3.amazonaws.com/sustainabledevelopment.report/2023/sustainable-
development-report-
2023.pdf">https://s3.amazonaws.com/sustainabledevelopment.report/2023/sustainabl
e-development-report-2023.pdf</a> FACILITATING INVESTMENT IN THE SUSTAINABLE
DEVELOPMENT GOALS <a href="https://unctad.org/system/files/official-
document/diaepcb2022d3_en.pdf">https://unctad.org/system/files/official-
document/diaepcb2022d3_en.pdf</a> FINANCING THE SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT GOALS
THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF THE MULTILATERAL DEVELOPMENT BANKS <a href="https://www.un.
org/ohrlls/sites/www.un.org.ohrlls/files/mdb.pdf">https://www.un.org/ohrlls/site
s/www.un.org.ohrlls/files/mdb.pdf</a> SCALING FINANCE FOR THE SUSTAINABLE
DEVELOPMENT GOALS Foreign Direct Investment, Financial Intermediation and
Public-Private Partnerships <a
href="https://globalcompact.no/app/uploads/2020/01/Scaling-SDG-
Finance.pdf">https://globalcompact.no/app/uploads/2020/01/Scaling-SDG-
Finance.pdf</a> TAKE-HOME MESSAGES •     Addressing SDG interlinkages requires
collective strength, and the evolving UN ecosystem serves as an enabling
platform for collaboration. Under the UN-Energy compacts, coalitions, alliances,
hubs, and public-private partnerships are shaping the landscape, addressing
energy's interconnectedness with gender, healthcare, clean cooking, resilience
for displaced people, green economy, and digital finance services. Joint
programs and inter-agency initiatives exemplify innovative solutions, serving as
sources of inspiration, while multi-stakeholder knowledge and data platforms
promote experiences sharing. •        Building and managing effective multi-
stakeholder partnerships for SDG progress involves embracing the dynamic
partnership lifecycle, understanding stakeholders, maximizing partnership value,
and operating under institutional readiness. Developing effective and
transformative joint programs, attractive for investment, necessitate catalyzing
policy changes, government ownership, aligned roles and responsibilities,
quality standards, and joint management for results. • Joint funds, investing
networks, partnership funds are shaping the financial landscape explicitly to
address SDG interlinkages. Innovative financial schemes are arising to be
leveraged, such as blended finance and impact investing, with digital
intelligence playing a key role. Financing frameworks, platforms, and tools are
emerging to facilitate the match between bankable projects and transition and
climate finances. TAKE-HOME MESSAGES •       Addressing SDG interlinkages
requires collective strength, and the evolving UN ecosystem serves as an
enabling platform for collaboration. Under the UN-Energy compacts, coalitions,
alliances, hubs, and public-private partnerships are shaping the landscape,
addressing energy's interconnectedness with gender, healthcare, clean cooking,
resilience for displaced people, green economy, and digital finance services.
Joint programs and inter-agency initiatives exemplify innovative solutions,
serving as sources of inspiration, while multi-stakeholder knowledge and data
platforms promote experiences sharing. •        Building and managing effective
multi-stakeholder partnerships for SDG progress involves embracing the dynamic
partnership lifecycle, understanding stakeholders, maximizing partnership value,
and operating under institutional readiness. Developing effective and
transformative joint programs, attractive for investment, necessitate catalyzing
policy changes, government ownership, aligned roles and responsibilities,
quality standards, and joint management for results. • Joint funds, investing
networks, partnership funds are shaping the financial landscape explicitly to
address SDG interlinkages. Innovative financial schemes are arising to be
leveraged, such as blended finance and impact investing, with digital
intelligence playing a key role. Financing frameworks, platforms, and tools are
emerging to facilitate the match between bankable projects and transition and
climate finances. Module Warp-Up Main take-home messages 1)  Amplify your
critical thinking skills to advance the Energy and Sustainable Development Nexus
Access to electricity and clean cooking acts as a catalyst for achieving
multiple SDGs, necessitating a focus on energy affordability and sufficiency,
sustainable battery management, and inclusive, gender-responsive approaches.
Renewable energies contribute to sustainable prosperity, requiring a holistic
approach to manage trade-offs, address water security challenges, and ensure
governance. Energy efficiency is pivotal for catalyzing sustainability but
demands attention to avoid development degrowth, mitigate large-scale impacts,
engage society through capacity-building, and reduce inequalities through
digitalization. 2)     Leverage strategic approaches and tools for maximizing
impact across multiple SDGs Four approaches revolutionize project design and
implementation by adopting a systemic perspective, gender mainstreaming, human
rights-based principles, and a portfolio approach for interconnected
interventions. Operationalizing nexus projects relies on critical tools such as
water-energy-food nexus methods, life cycle assessments, multi-criteria tools,
scenario thinking, theory of change, and digital intelligence for informed,
data-driven decisions. 3)    Unlock opportunities in the dynamic landscape of
partnerships and financial structures Addressing SDG interlinkages involves
collective strength, a synergy achievable by harnessing the newly emerging
nexus-specific UN ecosystem, emphasizing partnerships, compacts, and alliances.
Effective multi-stakeholder partnerships demand understanding stakeholders,
maximizing value, and embracing institutional readiness. Financially, the
landscape is evolving with emerging nexus-oriented joint funds, investing
networks, and partnership funds, complemented by innovative financial mechanisms
and digital intelligence. Financing frameworks, platforms, and tools are also
emerging to facilitate the alignment between bankable projects and transition
and climate finances. What next? This module provides the essential ingredients
to craft the right recipe for impactful change. Now that you've delved into the
intricate interaction between SDG7 and other SDGs, understanding their
synergies, and trade-offs, it's time to apply this knowledge practically.
Explore the methods and tools available to ensure their consideration throughout
the project cycle. Developing transformative and multi-objective solutions
becomes straightforward with the right tools. Find the ones that align with your
ambitions. Addressing the Energy and Sustainable Energy Nexus interlinkages is a
collaborative endeavor, with partnerships and collective action as major driving
forces. Find allies to multiply your strengths. Remember that effective
relationship-building requires strategic actions. Follow the updated guidelines
in these matters. The collaborative financial ecosystem offers a diverse array
of solutions tailored to all needs. Specific funds are on the rise to address
the SDG nexus, presenting the best solution to optimize finance for meeting the
2023 targets. Importantly, document your experiences to enhance the learning of
others. Your example can serve as a valuable guide for those embarking on a
similar journey. References [All references are cited as comments] >Icon
Description automatically generated< footnote1) endnote1)